 








Communication Networks Products | Corning










































Communication Networks Products | Corning














Main Menu









We use cookies to ensure the best experience on our website.
View Cookie Policy
/worldwide/en/corning-cookie-policy.html
_self
Accept Cookie Policy
 Change My Settings
 ESSENTIAL COOKIES
 Required for the site to function.
 PREFERENCE AND ANALYTICS COOKIES
 Augment your site experience. 
 SOCIAL AND MARKETING COOKIES
 Lets Corning work with partners to enable social features and marketing messages. 
 ALWAYS ON
 ON
 OFF






This site is best viewed in a modern web browser. Please update your browser for the best experience possible. 
Close[x]

















								Communication Networks

								Communication Networks

								Bringing you the life-enhancing benefits of fiber to the home.

								Bringing you the life-enhancing benefits of fiber to the home.

								Learn More 











								Communication Networks

								Communication Networks

								And the Emmy® goes to ...

								And the Emmy® goes to ...

								Learn More 










								Communication Networks

								Communication Networks

								ONE Wireless at Texas A&M's Kyle Field

								ONE Wireless at Texas A&M's Kyle Field

								Learn More 





















Communication
Networks Overview







Applications





Applications Overview
Broadband
CATV
Central Office/Headend Solutions
Data Center
Fiber to the Curb
Fiber to the Home
Harsh Environments
Local Area Networks
Long-Haul Networks
Microwave Connectivity
Submarine Networks
Wireless Networks








Products







Catalog







Support





Support Overview
Network Design Services
Customer Service
Project Services
Training Programs
Materials List
Order Tracker








Resources





Resources Overview
Application Engineering Notes
Articles
Bill of Materials Tool
Case Studies
Certificates
FlexNAP™ Systems Resource Center
Generic Specifications
Glossary of Terms
Hardware Drawings
Optical Fiber Resource Center
Order Tracker
Product Drawings Resource Center
Product Family Specifications
Product Installation Videos
Product Specifications
Standard Recommended Procedures
System Design Calculators
UniCam Connectors Resource Center
Videos
White Papers
Additional Information








Loyalty Programs





Loyalty Programs Overview
CAH Connections Gold Program
Elite Advantage Program
Fiber IQ Program
Network of Preferred Installers
Wireless Integrator Network








How to Buy







News & Events





News & Events Overview
News Releases
Training Events
Trade Shows
Subscription Center
Continuing Legal Education (CLE)

















Products
 Communication Networks
Products











Connecting businesses, homes, and people around the globe












Fiber Optic
 
Wireless
 
Copper
 
RF Connectivity
Cabinets
 
Coverage and Capacity
 
Closures
 
Broadband Coaxial Connectors
Cable
 
Network Components
 
Copper Network Components
 
Microwave Connectivity
Connectors and Adapters
 
 
 
 
 
 
Indoor Preterminated Systems
 
 
 
 
 
 
Optical Fiber
 
 
 
 
 
 
Outdoor Preterminated Systems
 
 
 
 
 
 
Outside Plant Splice Closures
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pre-connectorized Assemblies
 
 
 
 
 
 
Racks & Rack Mounted Housings
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Wall-Mounted Housings
 
 
 
 
 
 














OEM Solutions
Connectors & Adapters
Couplers & Splitters
Cable Assemblies  
Specialty Assemblies
Wavelength Management
Micro-optic Devices
VOAs & Switches
Nanomux Transceiver Optics












 Product Spotlight












                   Data Centers
             

                 Data Centers
            



              	Our solutions offer faster installation times and moves, adds, and changes (MACs), as well as 100 percent more density than preterminated systems.
            

            	Our solutions offer faster installation times and moves, adds, and changes (MACs), as well as 100 percent more density than preterminated systems.
            

				 Learn More
			












                   Fiber to the Home
             

                 Fiber to the Home
            



              	Corning is an industry-leading supplier of FTTH product solutions with over 10 years' and more than 25 million homes passed (HP).
            

            	Corning is an industry-leading supplier of FTTH product solutions with over 10 years' and more than 25 million homes passed (HP).
            

				 Learn More
			












                   Corning® ONE™ Wireless Platform
             

                 Corning® ONE™ Wireless Platform
            



              	Welcome to a bolder, brighter, broadband future. With Corning® ONE™ wireless platform, we introduce the optical network evolution: the first all-optical cellular and Wi-Fi solution.
            

            	Welcome to a bolder, brighter, broadband future. With Corning® ONE™ wireless platform, we introduce the optical network evolution: the first all-optical cellular and Wi-Fi solution.
            

				 Learn More
			












                   Optical Fiber
             

                 Optical Fiber
            



              	At Corning, innovation never stops. We changed communications with low-loss optical fiber. Now, 360-degree optical fiber will take everyone around corners and around the world.
            

            	At Corning, innovation never stops. We changed communications with low-loss optical fiber. Now, 360-degree optical fiber will take everyone around corners and around the world.
            

				 Learn More
			













						Optical Cables By Corning
					

















															Longer, Thinner, Lighter, Stronger
														

															Longer, Thinner, Lighter, Stronger
														

															Learn More
														


USB 3.Optical™ Cables by Corning and Thunderbolt™ Optical Cables by Corning connect computers and devices at incredible speed and over longer distances. They’re thin, light and remarkably tough — Optical Cables by Corning can be bent, squeezed, and tangled.




USB 3.Optical™ Cables by Corning and Thunderbolt™ Optical Cables by Corning connect computers and devices at incredible speed and over longer distances. They’re thin, light and remarkably tough — Optical Cables by Corning can be bent, squeezed, and tangled.



															Learn More
														














The Engineering of Easy: UniCam® Connectors
UniCam® Connectors






For years, the installation of cable networks' field connectors was a fairly time-consuming process. To ensure the seamless flow of data-forming light, each hair-thin strand of glass fiber had to be glued into a connector. Technicians had to tote along portable ovens to heat-cure the special epoxy.
After waiting for the connector to finish curing, the technician would clean and polish the components by hand to ensure the pristine surface required for optical transmission.
On average, it took six to eight minutes to terminate a single connector. Results varied widely, based on the skill and experience of the technician. As recently as the mid-1990s, that’s just how it was.
But as carriers everywhere began to embrace the fast transmission capabilities of optical fiber networks, Corning engineers knew they had to find a better way.
Read More













Spanning a broad range of end-to-end fiber and wireless solutions


















Innovation Spotlight




At the Speed of Light



How Fiber Changed The World
How Fiber Changed The World

												History is reshaped and standards re-evaluated when one discovery changes the world. Optical fiber has done that and so much more.

												History is reshaped and standards re-evaluated when one discovery changes the world. Optical fiber has done that and so much more.

												Learn More 














Innovation Spotlight




Corning MiniXtend® Cable Solutions



Corning MiniXtend® Cable Solutions
Corning MiniXtend® Cable Solutions

												Corning's micro cabling solution solves the demand for today's unlimited bandwidth capacity, and addresses escalating network duct congestion.

												Corning's micro cabling solution solves the demand for today's unlimited bandwidth capacity, and addresses escalating network duct congestion.

												Learn More 















Innovation Spotlight




Redefining Home Connectivity
Redefining Home Connectivity



Answering the Customer’s Call
It may not seem like it now, but it wasn’t that long ago that fiber to the home (FTTH) was in its infancy. There were no mass deployments, no customized products, and no recommended or common installation procedures. While Corning had been preparing for FTTH deployments for many years, we hadn’t yet had the opportunity to work with a customer and realize the vision of taking optical fiber all the way to the end customer. That changed when the first major carrier announced its plans to deploy FTTH technology.
With this announcement, we got to work, hand-in-hand with our customer. Our goal was to merge our expertise in fiber optics with the customer’s need for a reliable, future-ready product that could be deployed rapidly to allow for large-scale FTTH deployments. The result: The FlexNAP™ system, which uses standard optical fiber cables with network access points pre-installed at customer-specified locations along the length of the cable. With this product, we were able to bring the life-enhancing benefits of optical fiber to the customer, with deployments several times faster than traditional field installations.
Together with our customer, we developed a product that revolutionized FTTH delivery and is still an essential element in many FTTH deployments today.




















Technical Library



Literature to Support Your Key Applications
Literature to Support Your Key Applications

												Access product specification sheets, articles, case studies, white papers, standard recommended procedures, and applications engineering notes on our products and solutions.

												Access product specification sheets, articles, case studies, white papers, standard recommended procedures, and applications engineering notes on our products and solutions.

												Learn More 

























Events









															Trade Shows and Events
														

															Trade Shows and Events
														

															Learn More
														


We present and exhibit at trade shows and exhibitions on fiber optic technology, issues, and trends. Come see where we’ll be and how to find us.




We present and exhibit at trade shows and exhibitions on fiber optic technology, issues, and trends. Come see where we’ll be and how to find us.



															Learn More
														







Training









															SEE the LIGHT® Training Seminars
														

															Training Programs
														

															Learn More
														


Whether you are new to the industry, a veteran installer, a network manager, or a designer, See the Light® seminars offer something for everyone. Our curriculum includes hands-on training, intensive instructional courses, and webinars.




Whether you are new to the industry, a veteran installer, a network manager, or a designer, See the Light® seminars offer something for everyone. Our curriculum includes hands-on training, intensive instructional courses, and webinars.



															Learn More
														







Sales Demo









															Request a Sales Demo
														

															Request a Sales Demo
														

															Contact Us
														


We can send one of our trained sales engineers to your location to give a demonstration of the solutions you’re interested in and answer any questions you might have about Corning and our technology.




We can send one of our trained sales engineers to your location to give a demonstration of the solutions you’re interested in and answer any questions you might have about Corning and our technology.



															Contact Us
														







Subscription Center









															Stay connected!
														

															Stay connected!
														

															Sign-up Now
														


Sign up to receive the latest Corning information at our Communications Preference Center.




Sign up to receive the latest Corning information at our Communications Preference Center.



															Sign-up Now
														


















































General Machine Products Co., Inc.



















 


 






 


 





 





 





 





 














 GMP
                China


 


GMP Blog


 








General
                  Machine Products, a family-owned
                  business located in Suburban Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, is
                  a manufacturer of a wide range of products for the telecommunications,
                  power utility and cable television industries, and the contractors
            who serve them. 


 
            The company's total capabilities
                  include the development, prototyping and manufacturing of Aerial
                  Cable Construction Equipment & Tools, Copper & Fiber
                  Cable Placing Equipment, Manhole & Duct
                Tools, Installer's Hand Tools, Warning
                Signs, Tents and Tarps, Winches, Motor
                Vehicle Accessories, Specialty
            Hardware and Supplies.





 






 




















Home

About
                GMP

Products

Tutorials

Where
                To Buy

News

Feedback

Jobs





General
              Machine Products Co. 3111 Old Lincoln Highway Trevose, PA 19053
              USA
Tel: +1.215.357.5500 Fax: +1.215.357.6216 Email: info@GMPtools.com
© 2011 General Machine Products Co., Inc




























General DataComm - Home

































































						Xedge Products											

						GDC’s Xedge 6000 Multiservice Packet Exchange (Xedge MSPX) is a high capacity carrier class multiservice router/switch platform that can collapse disparate interfaces, protocols, and services into a single scalable solution.											
























JOIN US IN BOOTH 426
Smart Cities Connect Conference and Expo

Mark your calendar as Smart Cities Connect 2017 is coming to Austin, Texas at the Austin Convention Center from 26th to 28th June 2017.  
The 2017 Smart Cities Connect Conference and Expo brings together over 200 cities and their respective leadership to prospect and partner with innovative technology and service providers; linking progressive cities with state-of-the-art solutions and best practices.  Please join General DataComm at booth 426. 
 


















Get in touch with us
www.GDC.com
(203) 729-3182 • Sales & Support  (800) 523-1737 









Info.
Legal NoticesPrivacy PolicyGo to GDC HomeContact Us







Latest News






				General DataComm: Metro Ethernet Products			





				Time Independent Data Solution			





				General DataComm: Warranty			





				General DataComm: Team			





				General DataComm: Team Diagnostic			










Downloads
 













Marketing communications - Wikipedia





















 






Marketing communications

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






It has been suggested that this article be merged with Integrated marketing communications. (Discuss) Proposed since January 2017.







It has been suggested that Integrated marketing communications be merged into this article. (Discuss) Proposed since May 2016.


Marketing communications (MC, marcom, marcomm) uses different marketing channels and tools in combination:[1] Marketing communication channels focuses on any way a business communicates a message to its desired market, or the market in general. A marketing communication tool can be anything from: advertising, personal selling, direct marketing, sponsorship, communication, promotion and public relations.[1]
MC are made up of the marketing mix which is made up of the 4P's: Price, Promotion, Place and Product, for a business selling goods, and made up of the 7P's: Price, Promotion, Place, Product, People, Physical evidence and Process, for a service based business.[2]



Contents


1 Background
2 Marketing communication

2.1 Psychology of communication


3 Marketing mix
4 Communication process

4.1 Opinion leaders and opinion formers
4.2 Channel
4.3 Adjusted model of communications
4.4 Integrated marketing communications (IMC)


5 Traditional media

5.1 Television
5.2 Radio
5.3 Print


6 Communication platforms

6.1 Social mediation
6.2 The internet
6.3 Social media
6.4 Email
6.5 In-product communication
6.6 Branding
6.7 Direct marketing

6.7.1 Direct mail
6.7.2 Telemarketing
6.7.3 Mail order
6.7.4 Direct-response advertising


6.8 E-communications

6.8.1 The Internet
6.8.2 Cellular marketing
6.8.3 CD/DVD technology




7 Focus
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



Background[edit]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Marketing communications falls into various categories relating to marketing to the public, from advertising, promotions, sales, branding and online promotion. It is so spread out and iconic that it has become a favoured term amongst practitioners. It is a symbolic tool that helps organizations interact with their many stakeholders in the market, by promoting their goods or services to them. Whenever members of the public interact with an organization, marketing communication has been used. This is a significant process where businesses use to gain success and knowledge on their brand. In order to gain success in marketing both the organization and members of the public must be involved. Businesses cannot operate if they target every market to satisfy their consumer's satisfactions. By targeting audiences who appreciate the organizations marketing program will gain a successful branding. A target audience is a group of people that aimed at by the marketers, delivering them a message of their brand. The target audience will most likely be people who will react to their marketing communications in a positive way.
Marketing communications can fall into the same meaning as advertising. Advertising is the most common marketing term that organizations and even members of the public understand and evaluate, it has come across people at least a number of times in their everyday lives. Advertising is only a small section of marketing communications and is not an alternative term to it. Promotion and marketing communications is difficult to comprehend, therefore considering it as a term that can be similar within each other is more simple. The concept of the marketing communications mix which is a range of tools available to an organizations to deliver a clear and consistent message to their target audiences, thus impacting the businesses performance negatively or positively. It is also commonly called the promotional mix, Crosier (1990) states that all terms have the same meaning in the context of the 4ps. Marketing communications is very similar to marketing in general, similar to comparing advertising to marketing communications. When asking what marketing is, the marketing mix comes to mind and the most common way of describing it is by explaining the 4p's. Product, price, place and promotion. Price of a product or service can send a message to their target audience. For example, comparing a $10 bag to a $50 bag, the more expensive bag will most likely be a luxury item, more durable than the cheaper one. This is market information that can easily send out a message to all target audiences. The most fundamental part of explains what marketing is using the 4p's is that, it elaborates how promotion is crucial and a significant aspect of what marketing is all about.
Marketing communications and the marketing mix falls into the category of the marketing plan. The marketing plan is a specific document that outlines current marketing situations. This plan identifies key opportunities and threats, set objectives and develops an action plan to achieve marketing goals. Each section of the 4P's sets its own object, for instance, pricing objective might be to increase sales in a certain geographical market by pricing their own product or service lower than their competitors. This creates a significant change in the market because more people of the target market would aim to do business with your organization than your competitors, because pricing is one of the most significant aspects of marketing that can change the whole market positively and or negatively. Marketing communications presents a marketing strategy to draw the attention of all target audiences. Sending a message about the organizations 4p's can excite their interests and can help create a successful business.
Marketing communications consists of 5 key factors, persuasion and information, objectives, contact points, stakeholders and marketing communication activities. Firstly all marketing communication's goal is to persuade their target audience to change their attitudes and behaviour towards the organization . There are many ways to persuade the target audience. For instance, marketers can provide a valid reasoning and significant facts that can change consumer behaviour significantly. Listening and responding to any questions to the organization can go a long way in the driving success of the organization . From making the target audience feel special and heard of can instantly change their emotions and opinion of the organization. Marketing communication can work without an objective. Generally creating brand awareness, delivering information, educating the market and an advanced positive image for the organization can also persuade the target audience. Contact points must require managing and coordinating a marketing message. Contact points can range from stores where customers are able to physically experience the product and see it for themselves, customer calls where the hotline will be able to help all customers in need and advertisement through television, social media and others. Successful marketing requires that a message at every contact point can persuade any target audience. Stakeholders are anyone in the target market that can influence the purchase of the product or that can create success to the company. Competitors can be important stakeholders for an organization; by two competitors working together can help protect their market shares. Finally, marketing communication activities can send out a message informally by explicitly marking communication programs or informally through the marketing mix. There are two key types of messages marketing communications can deliver, unplanned and planned messages. Planned messages are delivered through, advertising, sales promotion, public relations, direct marketing, personal selling, point of purchase, packaging, specialties, sponsorships, licensing and customer service. Unplanned messages however are all about the company or brand sending out simplicity messages to consumers. Both types of messages are crucial as they bring a unified story to the market.
Marketing communication[edit]
Communication is one important aspect of the marketing mix.[3] Indeed, marketing communication is often the largest component of communication within a company, which may be to present company value, objectives or specific products and services to investors, customers or the general public. In the 21st century, communications objectives continue to lead towards more customized messages, targeting customer groups or individuals to create high responses and greater brand interaction.[3]
As business becomes increasingly global with greater access to Internet, mobile phones and social media, new challenges exist with communication professionals to inform people in particular foreign markets to facilitate business activity. Shifts in the global economy and access to new markets lead also to greater demands for product shipping and services delivered to customers in foreign markets. To be effective, communication strategies must converge with marketing objectives while also account for local languages, dialects and cultural norms.
Communications are including both external communication and internal communication.[3] External communication can be market research questionnaires, office website, guarantees, company annual report and the presentation for investors. Internal communication can be the marketing materials, price list, product catalogues, sales presentations and management communications. On the other hand, each market demands different types of communications. For example, industrial market demands a more personal communication but consumer market demand a non-personal communication.[3]
There are also 4 different fundamental types of communication.
One-to-many: this kind of communication is the most original communication. It is "generated from a single broadcast point and then available over airwaves or in mass print runs[3]". This type of communication is usually adapted to news distribution that does not specific not even interactive. Such as in an urgent notice play over airwave from broadcast in an industry, it is helpful for the general announcement.
Many-to-one: many-to-one is usually connected to the one-to-many communication.[3] For example, a reply button in your email box, a prepaid number bought from Spark. All the communication techniques proceeded to the public with bi-directional communication from mass communications.[3]
One-to-one: this is the most intensive and interactive communication at a one-to-one level.[3] There are so many examples like a sales presentation; a negotiation in the market or direct delivery is base on the one-to-one communication. Most of this communication is face to face. But in the development of Internet, email and online shopping are taking place the chance to face to face of people. Which is provided the chance to sellers and buyers talk more directly. Another important is instant message 'chat' channel like Wechat and Facebook, which are becoming extremely popular in business.[3]
Many-to-many: on the background of highly developed Internet, the many-to-many communication has been growing up such as online chat rooms, 'blogging' websites.[3] The many-to-many communication stands for the participants are able to exchange their ideas and experiences.
After all, each type of communication applies to different situation and is time-based.[3] The communications have the features of immediacy and longevity. Such as one-to-one is more focus on now but the many-to-may channels tend to less urgency and more reference.
Psychology of communication[edit]
One of the primary goals of a marketing communication is to persuade consumers, by either changing their perception of a brand, product or service, or persuading them to purchase (or feel motivated / tempted to purchase) a product or service. The "Elaboration Likelihood Model" is used to demonstrate how persuasion occurs. When a marketing communication message is sent out, first it must be acknowledged and attended by the receiver. By giving their attention to the marketing communication, consumers will begin to process and comprehend the message. There are two routes to persuasion: Central route and peripheral route. Central route processing is used in high-involvement purchase decisions. These are infrequent, high-risk purchases, usually involving large amounts of money and a significant amount of time (for example, purchasing a house or car). Because these purchase decisions are high risk, a large cognitive effort is expended in order to rationally select the most logical and valuable option available. In these marketing messages, information about the product or service itself is most valuable. Peripheral route processing is employed in low involvement purchase decisions. These are frequent, low-risk purchases, generally of a low or medium cost in which choices are made more on affective (or emotion based) values rather than cognitive (or rational) values. Because of this, marketing messages will employ more storytelling and imagery, focusing on how the product or service makes one feel, and the associations it has, rather than the attributes and specifications it possesses.
Opinion Leaders:[4] Opinion leaders are consumers who have large influence over the purchasing behaviour of other consumers. These can take the form of peers or celebrities, and often represent a "desired state" in the eye of the influenced consumer. By following the consumption patterns of opinion leaders, consumers aspire to achieve a similar status or lifestyle, and project a similar image. Because of this, opinion leaders are powerful factors in marketing communications. Having opinion leaders endorse a brand can increase brand awareness and sales. Due to this, large companies pay highly influential celebrities to endorse their products.
Opinion Formers:[5] Opinion formers are consumers who are regarded by their peers as being highly knowledgeable and trustworthy. They are considered experts in selecting the highest quality products due to their extensive knowledge, and as such are able to influence the purchasing behaviour of other consumers despite lacking the celebrity status of an opinion leader.
Communication Barriers: Communication barriers are factors that hinder the effectiveness of a marketing communication. Major communication barriers are: Noise and clutter, consumer apathy, brand parity and weak creative ideas or strategies. Noise is an unrelated sensory stimulus that distracts a consumer from the marketing message (for example, people talking nearby making it hard to hear a radio advertisement). Clutter is the high number and concentration of advertisements presented to a consumer at any time. As attention cannot be divided, there is a limit to how much can be taken in and processed, which means that a strong marketing communication needs to stand out from the clutter and be heard above the noise. (Ang, 2014. "Principles of Integrated Marketing Communications". Page 11.) Consumer apathy is the tendency of a consumer to avoid marketing communications. This can be for a number of reasons. The consumer may not be interested, or consider themselves "in the market," and as such attempt to shut out the irrelevant marketing stimuli. This is known as selective attention. Alternatively, a consumer may be "in the market," yet not be aware of the brand or products existence or prevalence. Consumers tend to purchase familiar brands, and will not be inspired to investigate alternatives. One approach marketers use to overcome apathy is to create incentives, such as competitive pricing or loyalty rewards. (Ang, 2014. "Principles of Integrated Marketing Communications". Page 11.) Brand parity means a brand is not significantly different from its competition. Without a distinct value proposition, consumers do not develop brand preference or associations, and instead purchase purely based on price (Ang, 2014. "Principles of Integrated Marketing Communications". Page 12). This is not ideal, as effective marketing communication increases brand equity. One important objective of marketing communications is to develop a strong, unique brand identity that allows the brand to be positioned separate from its competition.
Marketing mix[edit]
Main article: Marketing mix
Marketing mix is the most important part of marketing strategy, which is "the framework to manage marketing and incorporate it within a business context[6]". Refer to the marketing strategy; it is to identify how the business achieves their marketing objective and the service they want to deliver to their customers. And the initial step to achieve the marketing strategy to identify the market target and build up plan that the business should implement.[6] Also the business has to make sure every step of achieving marketing target is running effectively. One false step could cause a bad influence to the whole business. After all, this is a reason why the business needs marketing mix.
Communication process[edit]
Communication can be defined as process of using, word, sound or visual cues to supply information to one or more people.[7] A communication process is defined as information that is shared with the intent that the receiver understands the message that the business intended to send.[8] The communication process was once thought of as having the source of the message, which is then encoded, put through the chosen communication channel, which is then decoded by the recipient and then received.[9] Throughout the middle of the channel there is the potential for noise to distort the message being sent.[9] Once the receiver has the message they then give feedback to the original source, where they then find out whether the campaign has been successful or not.[9]




Transactional Model of Communication


In present times with the prevalent use of technology, customers are seeking out information about brands, products and businesses prior to purchase.[10] This means that there is a need for an additional channel within the communication process, so it is a more accurate representation of the current business environment. Businesses are now having to take into consideration that both opinion leaders and opinion formers who have a great influence over today's society and their perceptions. So they have to be included into the communication process before the recipient of the message receives it.[11]
Source: The source is an individual or organization that has information to share. The source (or sender) creates and sends the information to another person or group of people. The source maybe an individual (e.g. a sales person or spokesperson) or a non-personal identity (e.g. a corporation or organization). The communication process begins with the source, marketers must carefully choose a source as it affects how the message will be perceived by the target audience.[12]
Encoding: This is transposing the intended meaning of the message with words, symbols or pictures to show a message. Encoding is the development of the message that contains the information the source hopes to convey. It is putting together the thoughts, ideas and information into a symbolic form that can be transmitted and understood by the receiver.[12]
Encoding the message is the second step in the communication process. The encoding process leads to development of a message that contains the information or meaning the source hopes to convey. Encoding is extremely important, it is a brain activity that takes effect when the receiver makes sense of a brand message or idea used to convey meaning: words, colour, pictures, signs, symbols or even music. The message may be verbal or nonverbal, oral or written, or symbolic (e.g. the sound of a brass band being redolent of simpler times or heritage). or it can often include 'cues' such as the Nike 'swoosh' which indicates success. Often things can get in the way of the "correct" encoding and the interpretation of the intended message (decoding). There are methods the sender can use to make sure the receiver interprets the message correctly, these methods include; channels, consumer insights, having similarities with the receiver and frame of reference (e.g. age, values, culture).[9] Finally, it is extremely important for the sender to get to know its receiver and this is accomplished through research for targeting strategy. These concepts help craft the intended message in the minds of the consumer.
Message: The message comes from the encoding process, it is the content, meaning or information the sources hopes to convey. The message can be in many forms such as verbal, non-verbal, oral, written or symbolic.[12]
Decoding: The receiver unravels the symbols to interpret what is being communicated. Transforming the sender's message back into thought. This is influenced greatly by the receiver's frame of reference (or realm of understanding) which involves their values, attitudes and state of mind when receiving the message. For the model to be effective the decoding by the receiver would match the encoding by the source, meaning they correctly understand the message that was sent.[12]
The third stage of the marketing communication process occurs when a channel or medium delivers the message. Generally, receivers are the consumers in the target market or audience who read, hear, and/or see the marketer's message and decode it. Decoding is the process of interpreting messages and relies on correct encoding and the ability of the receiver to deconstruct transmitted meaning. Decoding occurs when the message reaches one or more of the receiver's senses. Consumers both hear and see television ads, others consumers handle (touch) and read (see) an advertising offer (e.g. coupon). According to Belch & Belch this process is deeply influenced by the receiver's frame of reference or field of experience, which refers to the experiences, perceptions, attitudes, and values he or she brings to the communication situation.[9] For effective communication to occur, the message decoding process of the receiver must match the encoding of the sender. Over this entire means the receiver comprehends and correctly translates what the source is trying to communicate. Effective communication is more likely to emerge when there is some common ground between the two parties. The more familiarity the sender has about the receivers, the better the sender can understand their needs, commiserate with them, and over all communicate more effectively.
Opinion leaders and opinion formers[edit]
Opinion leaders are people who are either celebrities, or a peer that has the ability to influence someone else's opinion/perception ("Opinion Leaders", n.d.). You can receive the opinion leaders' thoughts or feeling towards the product/service through paid advertising, social media, blogs, or any other form of written media. These can be direct, or indirect influences. Opinion formers are people that have specialized knowledge about the area which corresponds with the product, service or business ("Opinion Formers", n.d.). This can be a doctor sponsoring a form of medication, or a personal trainer recommending a sports brand to the customer. This means that both opinion leaders and opinion formers have a large influence on the consumer and their perceived view of the business, product, or service provided.[13] If a brand is specializing in the sale and manufacturing of makeup products, the business would want to look at someone who is both known for their knowledge about makeup and also someone who they know is popular within that community, so that the message is as wide spread throughout their target market as possible.[13]
Receiver: The individual (s) that the source shares thoughts or information with. The receiver hears, sees or reads the message and decodes it.
Noise: Noise is any external interference during this communication process. Any external factors that creates unplanned distortion. This distortion can make it difficult for the receiver to interpret or assign meaning to a message as it was intended by the source. Examples of noise in the encoding of the message could be lack of radio or television signal. Noise can also occur when the sender and receivers fields of experience do not overlap, if there is no common ground between them, which may result in a misunderstanding in the meaning of the message.[12]
Throughout the communication process, the message is subject to irrelevant factors that can distort or interfere with its reception. Noise is the physical or Psychological fundamentals either from inside or outside of the process of communication. Noise acts as a barrier as it makes the message less accurate, less productive and unclear. It may even prevent the message from ever reaching the receiver. Physical noise is often triggered by badly made images or messages (e.g. poor print quality) or elements of distraction (e.g. consumer scrolling through TV advertisements). Psychological noise could be mixed meanings, poor credibility of source or the insignificance of the message to the consumer requirements. Not having a connection with the receiver and lacking in common ground usually cause this. This may result in unsuitable encoding of the message such as; using a sign, symbol, or word that is unfamiliar or has different meaning to the receiver (e.g. sending a message in foreign language that is not understood by the receiver). The more common ground there is between the sender and the receiver, the less likely it is for noise and barriers to interrupt a message.[9]
Response/Feedback: The receiver's reaction to the message provides feedback to the sender. This is the set of reactions after seeing, hearing or reading the message. The receiver's response is the feedback and lets the sender know how the message was decoded and received. A form of feedback in an interpersonal selling situation could be questions, comments or any reactions (such as expressions) about the message. In mass media an indication of how the marketing communications were perceived is the amount of sales after the message has been sent. There are many different ways such as attitude change, store visits and inquires that provide feedback in mass media. Feedback can help to improve the communication process and the success of future messages.[12]
The receiver's particular type of reactions after seeing, hearing, or reading a message is known as a response. Receivers' responses can range from either non noticeable actions or noticeable actions. Non noticeable responses can be storing their information in memory and noticeable responses are immediate action such as dialing the commercials number to order a product advertised on television. One of the main goals of communication is receiving appropriate receiver responses, feedback closes the loop in the communications flow and lets the sender monitor how the intended message is being decoded and received. To achieve this goal one can ask indirectly or directly for the response, or assist the receiver in giving the response.[14] Receiving feed back can be more difficult for parties that advertise through the channels of mass media, because advertisers are not in direct contact with their customers so other methods must be obtained to determine how their messages have been received. While the critical form of feedback happens through sales, it is often hard to show a direct relationship between advertising and purchase behavior. So marketers; visit stores, check coupon redemption, use reply cards and listen to customer inquiries to achieve feedback. Once a significant amount of feedback/response study has been gathered advertisers would then have enough information to determine reasons for success or failure in the communication process and from there they can make appropriate adjustments.
Channel[edit]
The channel is the method by which the communication travels from the source or sender to the receiver.[9] There are two types of channels, personal and non-personal. Personal channels of communication are direct and target individual groups. Personal communication channels are connected with two or more persons who communicate directly with each other face-to-face, person-to-person through telephone, email or fax. Social channels also fall under the category of personal communications. Friends, neighbors, associates, co-workers, or family members are all means of social channels.[14] Carrying a message without interpersonal contact between sender and receiver is known as non-personal channels of communication. Mass media or mass communications are examples of non-personal channels, since the message is sent to many individuals at one time. Non-personal channels of communication are made up out of two main types, the first being print. Print media includes newspapers, magazines, direct mail, and billboards. The second type is broadcast; broadcast media includes radio and television.[15]
This model is more effective when there is common ground between the senders and receivers so they can communicate effectively. Choosing the appropriate source helps develop the message and appeal to the targeted audience. The source will be more effective if they are relatable to the target audience. This realm of understanding is represented by the overlapping circles. The more knowledge the source has about who they are targeting, the better they can understand how the receiver may interpret or react to the message.[12]
The core model of communication has been criticized for its linearity – sender, message, receiver and its absence of structural perception.[16] Since then an adjusted model of communication has developed.
Adjusted model of communications[edit]
The adjusted model of communication was developed within a marketing context, when marketers saw that people were affected more by influential homophilous groups (family and friends) and heterophilous groups (outside the person's network) than mass media (Dahlen, 2010).
The adjusted model is different to the core model of communication because it incorporates opinion leaders also known as gate keepers. Opinion leaders are perceived to be of a higher social status, a socialite, and of high influence in their peer groups. Opinion leaders do not have the same authority as opinion formers. Opinion formers also known as change agents have formal influence over groups of people. They provide an expert opinion or recommendation in their profession. Both opinion leaders and opinion formers have influence over the opinions of others.





This article may contain too much repetition or redundant language. Please help improve it by merging similar text or removing repeated statements. (January 2017)


Opinion leaders add another link in the communication process, acting as a "meaning filter" for the receivers of the message (Dahlen, 2010). The message is sent from the sender and the opinion leaders share their opinions with the targeted audience.
Integrated marketing communications (IMC)[edit]
Main article: Integrated marketing communications
Integrated marketing communications (IMC) is a communication process that entails the planning, creation, integration, and implementation of diverse forms of marketing communications. IMC unifies and coordinates the organizations marketing communications to promote a consistent brand message.[17] Coordinating the brands communications makes the brand seem more trustworthy and sound as it is seen as a 'whole' rather than a mixture of different messages being sent out.[18] The IMC perspective looks at the 'big picture' in marketing, advertising and promotions.[12]
Traditional media[edit]
Traditional media include broadcast channels (television, radio and cinema), print (newspaper, magazine, books, directories) and public advertising such as billboards, posters and public transport. TV, radio and print remain the largest media to advertise in, accounting for approximately 70% of all media expenditure. These are known as traditional media as they have existed effectively for the longest. The effectiveness of traditional media is its ability to reach large numbers of people. For this reason, it is also referred to as "mass media".
Television[edit]
Television has since its inception dominated the advertising media scene, due to its combination of visual and aural stimulation, allowing for greater attention grabbing and more effective transmission of messages than other forms of media. This makes it a strong choice for a marketer wishing to increase brand awareness. Most homes in developed countries have at least one television, which makes it an ideal choice for reaching consumers, however there are a few disadvantages: Television commercials suffer from being "zipped" and zapped": "Zipping" is the term given to fast forwarding commercial break sessions during the pre-recording of programs. Often viewers will record programs purely so they can be viewed without the commercial breaks. "Zapping" is the term given to the habit of many consumers to change channels during commercial breaks. This is also done to avoid watching advertisements. Using television advertisements is beneficial due to its wide reach and the degree to which content can be segmented according to the intended target market. Advertisements are carefully paired with time segments and / or linked with appropriate programming, known as "media vehicles". This helps to ensure the intended audience is being reached with the marketing message (Ang, 2014. "Principles of Integrated Marketing Communications". Page 118.).
Radio[edit]
Despite being the oldest form of media transmission still being used, marketing via radio remains a popular and effective choice due to its relatively lower cost and convenience (one may watch television ads in the comfort of their home only, while radio exposure can occur additionally during transit, at work, and during recreational activities such as shopping). Due to the lack of a visual aspect, radio advertising attempts to create imagery in the consumers mind. Radio advertising is also extremely effective at reinforcing messages encountered in other channels (such as television). (Ang, 2014. "Principles of Integrated Marketing Communications". Page 122.) A familiar jingle or voice associated with a brand enhances brand and ad awareness, ultimately increasing brand equity. This is an example of "Integrated Marketing Communications", in which multiple marketing channels are simultaneously utilized to increase the strength and reach of the marketing message. Like television, radio marketing benefits from the ability to select specific time slots and programmes (in this case in the form of radio stations and segments within).
Print[edit]
Printed media is the most basic form of media advertising. It is the most challenging to create strong imagery with, due to its lack of sensory stimulation, but can be effective in efficient, clear information communication and message delivery. Where a consumer may miss a message in video or audio (perhaps a loud noise interrupts, or someone blocks their view) in print the message remains visible indefinitely. Aspects such as size, colour and style can be used to increase effectiveness relative to other print advertisements, which is important as despite being a basic media communication channel, print is the second largest medium after television (Ang, 2014. "Principles of Integrated Marketing Communications". Page 126.).
Traditionally, marketing communications practitioners focused on the creation and execution of printed marketing collateral. Traditional media, or as some refer to as old media, has been used within the marketing and advertising world for many years.[19] Traditional media encompasses conventional forms of advertising media, such as television, magazines, newspapers, radio, and direct mail and outdoor. For many decades, these forms of communication have been the main source for marketers to reach both consumers and other companies. In a world with no internet and the vast world of social media, roots of advertising and promotion lie within traditional media, where there is a more direct, physical way of advertising.
In traditional advertising and promotion in terms of media, it usually conveys of having a physical display or action to channel the sender's message. Advertising in the form of print is used by businesses in the form of billboards, magazines, newspapers and posters, to get their message across to the target audience. The effectiveness of print relates back to aspects of the marketing mix's 4 P's. Print advertisement is in physical form, the whereabouts of where u place the print will contribute to how effective it will reach the target audience. Businesses will usually place a billboard in areas where in can be easily seen and where the target audience will spend their daily activities. Newspaper, magazines and posters are smaller in size and can be found in numerous places allowing the general public availability to read them. Depending on the product or service that is being advertised, marketers may specify where majority of their prints may go to, such as advertisement of a new shampoo may be more common within salons. Television and radio use physical actions to advertise, which reaches the consumers senses of hearing or seeing or both. These forms of traditional media channel the message intended by visually and/or vocally communicating them to the consumer. Though traditional media is effective, over the last few years there have been more and more businesses utilizing new media to reach its target audiences.[19]
Technology advancements have created new and efficient ways for marketers to reach consumers, not just affecting modern media but also affecting the more traditional media. Traditional media is gradually losing effectiveness.[20] Traditional media is becoming an increasingly less powerful mean of communicating with consumers and this change is driven by two key factors, audience fragmentation and ability to choose commercial content. Television, radio, magazines, and newspapers are becoming more fragmented and reaching smaller and more selective audiences. The rapid growth of communication due to interactive media, particularly the internet have caused the changes in the use of communication through media, with businesses preferring to use modern media over more traditional media methods. Consumers no longer accept the faith they once had in conventional advertising placed in traditional media. Consumers cannot avoid new and innovative ways of communication.[19] The larger companies are realizing that to be able to survive in the 21st century, they must adapt to new modern ways of advertising. If they do not adapt, competitors in their respective industries will make it more difficult for their business to survive. Many marketers believe that traditional methods of advertising have become too expensive and is not cost-effective compared to modern media. Companies are looking to use lower-cost, more targeted means of communication such as direct mail, sales, promotions, marketing and sponsorships and the most common in modern times, the internet. The internet is an interactive medium that is becoming an essential part of the communication strategies. Traditional forms of marketing communications such as advertising are one way in nature, whereas new media allows marketers to perform a variety of functions. Interactive media such as internet, C-D-ROMS, kiosks and interactive television allow consumers to alter information and images given to them, make inquiries, respond to questions and make purchases. The transition of marketing communications from applying traditional media to modern media has significantly influenced the success of the communication process. Interactive media allows marketers to interact with the audience easier and more efficiently. It is a rapid procedure to communicate through interactive media to promote goods and services. Marketers can now channel their message to the target audience in a short span of time and a cost-efficient way. Advertising campaigns have the feature of adaptability with ease and innovations. It also allows marketing messages to go viral and response and feedback can occur at any time along the communication process, as it is an open and flexible method of channeling communication.[19]
Communication platforms[edit]





This section may be in need of reorganization to comply with Wikipedia's layout guidelines. Please help by editing the article to make improvements to the overall structure. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


During the last decade communication platforms like Skype, Facebook or other types of medias have become extremely important means of communication. Although there are other methods of communications that aren't just related to social media, people can also be hugely influenced by their peers, this process is known as social mediation. Marketing Communication Platforms are a powerful capability for personalizing and expending marketing contents in an automated fashion based on the profile of the recipients.[15]
A platform by simplest definition is a raised floor or stage.[21] It functions as a similar principle in marketing communications, providing awareness and information about a specific brand or product.[22] Strategic selection of various communication platforms is known as a media strategy which aims to engage an audience in a meaningful conversation and, as a result, create a lasting relationship.[23] Modern technology has expanded the use of platforms and ways in which consumers and the brand can interact. As a result, the context of platforms and how they are defined has changed.[24] There are various platforms by which communication is transmitted,[25] and these can be categorised as paid, owned, earned and shared, formally named as the integrated communication triangle by Grönroos and Lindberg-Repo.[26] The model acknowledges that communication must be credible and trustworthy to be effective. Studies reveal many consumers look at review forums and ask friends or peers whom they trust for ratings on products before making a purchase decision.[24] Therefore, effective communication relies on an integrated approach of one dimensional and interactive platforms.[27]
Explicitly planned market content is communicated through non-personal communication platforms.[28] The brand is in control of the platform, message content, frequency and repetition of the communication message.[29] This is typically accomplished through traditional paid platforms, such as, print, electronic, outdoor and alternative media, that aims to target a mass segment of the target market.[28]
Print media includes newspapers and magazines, these publications are a highly customizable and vary in print size, font, positioning and colour combination. Newspapers commonly use coarse paper and tend to have poor reproduction quality, while magazines can enhance the appearance of a certain product due to the heavy weight gloss paper used which translates colour well and offers a long lasting quality and likeability.[25] Magazines function as a frame, a psychological device which manipulates perspective and judgement.[30] For example, Vogue, a leading paid circulation fashion magazine,[31] publishes advertising efforts alongside beautiful imagery and elegant photography, the association of the two communicates respectability and sophistication and promotes the creditability of the brands which appear in the same publication. Due to the high-quality reproduction, magazines tend to last longer and are often found in hair salons and waiting rooms. Consumers often cut out individual images which further prolongs the message and increases potential exposure. Although the relevance of the message may be lost during this extended time, brand awareness may still be raised.[25]





This article may contain too much repetition or redundant language. Please help improve it by merging similar text or removing repeated statements. (January 2017)


Magazines are often segmented by subject such as women's health, automotive or fashion and therefore effectively reach a particular target market while newspapers focus on geographical regions which tend to appeal to a broad representative population sample and, therefore, offer low impact in selectivity. Newspapers are often run on a weekly schedule offering up to date information and coverage of local events and businesses as a lower coast alternative. Such advertisements in smaller typeface and are black and white.[25]
Electronic media, likewise a paid platform includes radio and television.[25] Radio by definition is the broadcasting of sound programmes to the public and today can be live streamed through a broadband connection or digitally transmitted into people's cars or homes.[32] Fill et al.[25] acknowledges radio communication promotes "emotional consumer–centric associations" as each listener is forced to construct a visual representation of the words and sounds such as music in their minds. A common technique used by companies is known as imagery transfer, where a complementary visual television advertisement is used alongside a one-dimensional radio advertisement featuring a similar audio track to stimulate a visual association between the two.[33] Research suggests this sub-conscience relational thought process greatly benefits future brand recognition and awareness.[25]





This article may contain too much repetition or redundant language. Please help improve it by merging similar text or removing repeated statements. (January 2017)


Television and radio channel options have significantly increased in the last decade and are therefore a selective and deeply segmented communication platform. Furthermore, a brand can select which time of the day certain advertisements are to be played, for example, during rush hour. Both Television and radio commercials are often efficient to produce. While initial production costs of a television advertisement are high, it is likely to reach a mass audience and, therefore, maintains a low cost per viewer, making it an efficient communication platform.[25] Likewise, radio infomercials are often a simple script that is read out by the presenter. This is quick and does not require extensive lead times due to minimal production efforts.[32] The biggest downfall of electronic media is its function as background noise. For example, many listen to the radio while cooking and cleaning while others switch between television channels to avoid advertisements, this may limit the effectiveness of reach and frequency and therefore, message recall.[25]





This article may contain too much repetition or redundant language. Please help improve it by merging similar text or removing repeated statements. (January 2017)


Other aspects of noise decrease the effectiveness of message penetration, for example, most paid communication platforms, print and electronic media are filled with marketing and advertising messages and are subject to clutter, often forcing brands to compete for attention.[22] To eliminate noise brands often choose to include inserts such as samples and scent strips within magazines while newspapers utilise "call to action" inserts such as coupons which encourage consumers to visit or try a local service or good.[25]
Due to the rise in advertising clutter, there has been a push for non-traditional media such as guerrilla marketing.[34] Guerrilla Marketing is usually a low-cost way of generating buzz through creative or unexpected communication platforms.[35] It is often outdoors which has the potential to gain attention from a large sum of the audience, for example customising street infrastructure or creating an even such as a flash mob. Research rates guerrilla advertising as having a higher perceived value compared to other communication platforms, which tends to result in a positive consumer response.[34] An example of successful guerrilla marketing was created by Volkswagen (VW) in their promotional "driven by fun" campaign, where consumers could use VW "fast lane" slide instead of the escalator to get to the bottom of the stairs faster.[36]
Every point of contact is a form of communication and it is, therefore, necessary to consider touch points as a communication platform. Touch points are owned communication and can be either physical or a human interaction between a brand and the consumer which influence customer decision-making process during pre-purchase, purchase and post-purchase.[37]
There are many ways in which a customer may interact with a business.[22] Interactions occur through direct customer service exchanges, a company website, the point of purchase environment and product packaging or performance.[37] These all contribute to consumer perceptions of a particular brand. For instance, the service-scape of a purchase touch point such as a retail store can influence the perception of quality and service through lighting and layout or other sensory touch points, for example smell.[22] Fast fashion retailers such as Topshop maintain a white store interior and exterior which is perceived as luxurious.[38] Likewise, the higher price point and packaging of Ferrero Rocher may communicate sophistication and better quality. Visual appearance can have a significant effect on purchase decision,[37] companies such as Coke a Cola and Pepsi provide a free fridge to distributors to control how products are displayed at the point of purchase.[22]
In contrast, United Airlines is an example of how poor utilisation of post-purchase customer service can have an adverse effect on company reputation.[23] While boarding a United Airlines flight, Dave Carroll saw baggage handlers on the tarmac damage his guitar "Taylor".[39] After failed attempts to solve the issue through customer service, Carroll uploaded a humorous YouTube video titled "United breaks guitars",[23] which has experienced significant viewership and currently holds over 15 million views.[40] Reportedly, United faced a significant drop in the stock market.[23]
Carroll's YouTube video is an example of the multiplier effect, and how consumer attributes are shared through user-generated content (UGC) networks and word of mouth communication.[23] Research shows customer are more likely to pass on negative experiences, and therefore, such interactive platforms of communication have a significant impact on purchase decisions and brand outlook.[29]
This links to the new trend in consumer behaviour and integration of marketing communications, where technological developments have enabled socially mediated communication. The dynamics of communication platforms has changed from one-way flow where companies were in control of the message to a continuum dialogue where businesses interact with consumers in a co-creative process.[29] As Andy Lark, Commonwealth Bank CMO states "the power has shifted, we are now entering a transparent age where there are no secrets".[41]
Traditional single step communication was business to consumer orientated, where users took a passive role in the process with little feedback.Further studies have shown consumers are more likely to find interpersonal communication from influential people like family and friends more credible than mass media[24] Such influential people are known as opinion leaders and formers, who maintain a high social standing within a given group or hold expert knowledge, for example, a doctor.[22] These further developments highlight the importance of opinion leaders as can be seen in the two-step linear model of communication purposed by Roger,[24] where opinion leaders function as intermediaries by interpreting and filtering information to their followers. These traditional models view paid media platforms as the primary source of information, however, this has changed due to technological developments in communication platforms which enable dialogue among consumers within a consumer-centric communication from which meaning is constructed.[24] This multi-dimensional non-linear flow of communication allows a many to many exchanges of information through platforms such as UGC. UGC includes all the ways in which people publish creative content publicly online through blogs, chats, forums, online platforms for product reviews and social media websites such as Facebook, YouTube and Instagram,[29] this is known as earned and shared media.[23]
Nike is an example of how such earned and shared media has created co-creation due to a shift in the consumer relationship through customer empowerment. Nike ID is an online application that allows customers to design their shoe and therefore "Just do it online".[22] Therefore, interactive media is highly critical to integrated marketing communication as it may benefit organizations by engages with valuable customers and may encourage positive word of mouth communications.[29]
Studies show that market-generated media is still an important communication platform and information source.[29] Consumers tend to consider both market-generated and UGC when making a purchase decision,[24] particularly, for higher involvement product like vinyl albums.[42] However, the movement from traditional media to various forms of online and UGC marketing is a rising trend, and academics recognize that marketing communication is an open system and customer attributes are influenced by multiple aspects of business surroundings through various communication platforms[22] Ultimately positive brand encounters manifest brand supporters who contribute to positive earned and shared media, through product recommendations online and offline.[24]
Social mediation[edit]





This section may be in need of reorganization to comply with Wikipedia's layout guidelines. Please help by editing the article to make improvements to the overall structure. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


According to Laszerfeld, Berelson and Gaudet, people tend to be more affected by influential homophilous groups (family and friends) and also heterophilous crowds (people that are outside of an individual's personal network) rather than by the mass media.





This article may contain too much repetition or redundant language. Please help improve it by merging similar text or removing repeated statements. (January 2017)


This process which is known as social mediation, initiated the idea of opinion leaders and opinion formers. Opinion leaders and opinion formers are influential in shaping the opinions of others.[27] Opinion leaders are peers that can influence a message to an audience but they are not seen as an expert in their field. They may pick up their information from the media or may comment on blogs,[43] they are regularly perceived by their immediate peer group to embody the characteristics of an innovator or social light.[27] Opinion formers are people that are knowledgeable in their field. This may be derived from their professional position, formal influence, job status or qualification over groups.[43] Opinion leaders add another link in the communication chain process and act as meaning filter for the targeted audience.
The internet[edit]
The Internet features both non-personal as well as personal forms of communication. It has become one of the most dominant sources of information for most consumers. Belch & Belch (2012) explain that the internet is mostly a non-personal form of communication as consumers are absorbing information provided online with no personal contact between the consumer and the organizations that are providing the information on their websites. However, as the internet continually develops, it is now progressively changing into a form of personal communication as consumers have the ability to interact with marketers online as well as communicate and share information with one another through the use of social media.[9]
Social media[edit]





This article may be confusing or unclear to readers. Please help us clarify the article. There might be a discussion about this on the talk page. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Social commercials market share is rising, thanks to services like YouTube, Facebook and Instagram. With the explosion of social media usage around the world, social media websites have become an important platform for businesses to engage with customers, prospects, employees, and applicants. To personally engage with existing and future customers, reinforce brand messaging, influence customer opinions, provide targeted offers, and service customers more efficiently, companies are beginning to use external social media platforms.[44]
Email[edit]
Email marketing is directly marketing a commercial message to a group of people using email. In its broadest sense, every email sent to a potential or current customer could be considered email marketing. It usually involves using email to send ads, request business, or solicit sales or donations, and is meant to build loyalty, trust, or brand awareness. Email marketing can be done to either sold lists or a current customer database. Broadly, the term is usually used to refer to sending email messages with the purpose of enhancing the relationship of a merchant with its current or previous customers, to encourage customer loyalty and repeat business, acquiring new customers or convincing current customers to purchase something immediately, and adding advertisements to email messages sent by other companies to their customers.
In-product communication[edit]
Another channel for direct digital marketing is in-product communication (or in-product marketing), which delivers marketing content directly to a user's internet-connected device or software application. In-product marketing content is often very similar to that of email marketing campaigns, but the segmentation and delivery is more targeted. Because email has become a standard tool in the digital marketing toolkit, the email channel often is overloaded and overused, leading to much lower open rates, lower engagement rates, lower click-through rates (CTR), and lower conversion rates. The rise of internet-connected (IOT) devices is enabling a growing number of consumer products manufacturers to take advantage of this channel of marketing communications, to supplement other digital marketing channels.
Branding[edit]





This section may be in need of reorganization to comply with Wikipedia's layout guidelines. Please help by editing the article to make improvements to the overall structure. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


The first era of branding came to the new world in 1541 when Cortez imported Spanish cattle stamped with his trademark brand of 3 crosses, this solved the issue of knowing who's cow belonged to who. Branding is an extremely important communication platform in the marketing communication process. If a company brand isn't effectively communicated customers could easily become confused and possibly give their attention to another organization . Branding goes beyond having a logo, its how businesses communicate on behalf of their company, verbally and visually. A brand is a conversation, It is how people talk about your company when you are not in the room.[44] Consumers are constantly interacting and meeting with brands. This can be through television or other media advertisements such as event sponsorships, personal selling and product packaging. Brand exposure such as this is known as a brand touch point or brand contact whereby the organization can try impressing its consumer. Without branding, consumers wouldn't be able to decipher between products and decide which one they like most. People may not be able to even tell the differences between some of the brands, they would have to try each brand several times before being able to judge which one was best. In order to help with purchase decisions, marketing communications try to create a distinct image for the brand. Brand associations are made to encourage linkages with places, personalities or even emotions which creates a sophisticated brand personality in the minds of the consumers. This shows how brand communications add value to products[27] and why branding is a crucial aspect to the communication platform.
Direct marketing[edit]
Direct marketing is defined as the process in which individual customers' responses and transactions are recorded.[45] Direct marketing has increased over the past decade and is an important aspect to Marketing Communications. Direct marketing's largest strength is that it is a communication tool that is designed to build the relationship between the customer and the brand.[46] A large part of this area is Customer Relationship marketing. organizations use accounts of the customers to give specific experiences in order to satisfy their needs. It is the process of managing detailed information about the customer's touch points with the objective to maximize satisfaction and loyalty. This type of communication can be transmitted in person, by telephone, mail, email or website.[47] An important part of direct marketing is that it is the interaction between the organization and the customer and is mostly a two-way communication. Direct marketing relies heavily on databases, which contain valuable information on the customers. organizations should understand that databases could provide a competitive advantage and in turn increase profitability. Mistakes that organizations make are treating databases as an expense rather than an investment and not maintaining or updating them sufficiently.[47]
Direct mail[edit]
This form of direct marketing is usually a letter, catalogue, or sample. These items are sent through post, e-mail, fax, and courier. This communication indicates that the recipient has shown interest in or has previously purchased from the organization . Advantages of direct mail are personalisation, careful targeting, creativity and flexibility. Email is low-cost, but can be lost through spam and junk email filters. Direct mail is heavily dependent on databases that should be kept up to date.[47]
Telemarketing[edit]
Telemarketing is the type of marketing communication transmitted through telephone. There are 2 types of telemarketing: Outbound and Inbound.[47] Outbound telemarketing is used by organizations to reach out to potential customers, generate sales, make appointments with salespeople and introduce new products. Inbound telemarketing is where people call the organization to complain or inquire about products. Both outbound and inbound can be used as a customer service strategy to boost sales and receive suggestions for improvement. Advantages of telemarketing are that it allows targeted communications, it is a flexible and direct interaction between the organization and the customer, it can accompany the personal selling platform well and it is cost effective per contact compared to personal selling. A disadvantage is that call centres are usually used to handle outbound and inbound telemarketing, which needs to be implemented, managed and financed.[47]
Mail order[edit]
Mail order as a form of direct marketing is a catalogue of products that customers can order to receive in the mail. This form of direct marketing dates back over 100 years. Home shopping, online shopping and teleshopping now accompany it. With current technology mail order has improved. Now there can be a larger range in catalogue, delivery is faster, and complaints are dealt with professionally. Advantages of mail order are they exert less pressure to the customer than telemarketing and sales are easy to manage, however costly infrastructure is required in maintaining the back-end.[47]
Direct-response advertising[edit]
Direct-response advertising is a message transmitted through traditional media communications that requires the reader, viewer, listener or customer to respond directly to the organization .[47] The audience may respond to receive more information or to purchase a product. A common example of direct response advertising is in television "home shopping". Viewers are told to purchase the product right away to receive a particular deal or discount. Disadvantages are that focus can be lost because of the medium of communication and the targeting can be less narrow compared to direct mail. organization 's messages can get cluttered and crowded. By using radio and magazine advertising organizations are able to narrow in on their target audience.[47]
E-communications[edit]
With the introduction of new technology, new media opportunities have opened for organizations to have greater impact with their marketing communications. E-communications are the types of new electronic media. Media included are: the Internet, the World Wide Web (www.), Cellular technology and SMS, touch-screen kiosks, CD and DVD technology and Smart cards.[47]
The Internet[edit]





This article may contain too much repetition or redundant language. Please help improve it by merging similar text or removing repeated statements. (January 2017)


The Internet allows many multimedia documents to be shared among its users. In 2003 approximately 30 million websites have been registered worldwide and 650 million were connected to the Internet.[48] The Internet as a marketing tool can be used to reach customers directly, inform customers, create brand loyalty, build relationships and altogether be used as a marketing communications platform. Online advertising can be used to build brand attitudes, it includes techniques such as: graphic images as website banners, pop-up advertisements, homepage restyling and anchor deals (co-operation between two organizations ).[47]
Cellular marketing[edit]
Cellular marketing uses audience's mobile phone and SMS to promote a product or brand. Advantages are that there are high levels of flexibility and it can be easily integrated through computer systems using the Internet to send mass text messages. Using databases this platform of marketing communications allows organizations to directly target customers and remember important information such as their name. Uses for sending mass SMS messages to customers could be reminding them to renew magazine subscriptions, giving exclusive product discounts, or building brand reputation through competitions or sweepstakes. When using customer's personal information permission must be granted.[47]
CD/DVD technology[edit]
CD and DVD can be used as part of e-communications. Entire marketing presentations, catalogues, brochures and price lists can be stored on a CD. CDs are small and simple to hand out to target audiences and most modern computers have CD drive readers, however most of the aforementioned information can be presented on a website or email.[47]
Focus[edit]
Marketing communications are focused on the product/service as opposed to corporate communications where the focus of communications work is the company/enterprise itself. Marketing communications are primarily concerned with demand generation and product/service positioning[49] while corporate communications deal with issue management, mergers and acquisitions, litigation, etc.
See also[edit]

Advertising management
Brand awareness
Consumer behaviour
Co-marketing
Integrated marketing communications
Marketing activation
Real-time marketing
Media intelligence

References[edit]



^ a b Tomse, & Snoj, 2014
^ Kusumawati, Oswari, Utomo, & Kumar, 2014
^ a b c d e f g h i j k Doyle, Charles (2011). A Dictionary of Marketing. Oxford: Oxford University Press. 
^ Opinion Leaders. (n.d.). Business Dictionary. Retrieved from http://www.businessdictionary.com/definition/opinion-leaders.html
^ Opinion Formers. (n.d.). Business Dictionary. Retrieved from http://www.businessdictionary.com/definition/opinion-formers.html
^ a b Harriet, Posner. Marketing Fashion, Second edition : Strategy, Branding and Promotion. Laurence King Publishing. p. 40. 
^ *Communication. (n.d.). Merriam-Webster. Retrieved from http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/communication
^ Communication process. (n.d.). Business Dictionary. Retrieved from http://www.businessdictionary.com/definition/communication-process.html
^ a b c d e f g h Belch, G. E., & Belch, M. A. (2012). Advertising and promotion: An integrated marketing communications perspective (9th ed.). New York, NY: McGraw-Hill Irwin. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Edelman, D. C., & Singer, M. (2015). Competing on Customer Journeys. Harvard Business Review, 93(11), 88-100
^ Zhang, L., Zhao, J., & Xu, K. (2016). Who creates Trends in Online Social Media: The Crowd of Opinion Leaders? Journal of Computer-Mediated Communication, 21(1), 1-16
^ a b c d e f g h Belch, G. E., & Belch, M. A. (2003). Advertising and promotion: An integrated marketing communications perspective. The McGraw− Hill. Retrieved from, http://202.74.245.22:8080/xmlui/handle/123456789/54
^ a b Stehr, P., Rossler, P., Leissner, L., & Schonhardt, F. (2015) Parasocial Opinion Leadership Media Personalities Influence within Parasocial Relations: Theoretical Conceptualization and Preliminary Results. International Journal of Communication (19328036), 9982-1001
^ a b Krizan, A., Merrier, P., Logan, J., Williams, K. (2008). Business communication (7th ed). Canada. p. 15. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ a b Modica, T., Hoffmann, K. (2010). "Formal Modeling of Communication Platforms using Reconfigurable Algebraic High-Level Nets". CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Hall, S. (1980). Encoding/decoding. Culture, media, language, 128-138. Retrieved from, http://www.hu.mtu.edu/~jdslack/readings/CSReadings/Hall_Encoding-n-Decoding.pdf
^ Shimp, T. A. (2010). Integrated Marketing Communication in Advertising and Promotion 8e. International Edition. Printed in China. Retrieved from, https://www.cengagebrain.co.uk/content/shimp65318_0324665318_02.01_chapter01.pdf
^ Duncan, T. 2002. IMC: Using Advertising and Promotion to Build Brands. New York: McGraw-Hill. Retrieved from https://fcis.vdu.lt/~n.klebanskaja@evf.vdu.lt/FOV1-000B9289/FOV1-000C34CF/FOV1-000C000C/49232761.pdf
^ a b c d Belch, & Belch (2004). Advertising and promotion: An integrated marketing communications perspective. Boston, M.A: McGraw-Hill. 
^ Trusov, Bucklin, & Pauwel (2009). "Effects of Word-of-Mouth Versus Traditional Marketing: Findings from an Internet Social Networking Site.". Journal of Markerting. 73 (5): 90–102. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Oxford Dictionary of English. Oxford, UK: Oxford University Press. 2010. p. 1360. 
^ a b c d e f g h Dahlen Michael; Lange Fedrick; Smith Terry (2010). Marketing Communication: A brand narrative approach (PDF). West Sussex, UK: John Wiley & Sons. [permanent dead link]
^ a b c d e f Cundari, Aldo (2015). Consumer-Centric Marketing. Wiley. 
^ a b c d e f g Cole, Michael D.; Long, Mary M.; Chiagouris, Larry G.; Gopalakrishna, Pradeep (2011-04-01). "Transitioning from Traditional to Digital Content: An Examination of Opinion Leadership and Word-of-Mouth Communication across Various Media Platforms". Journal of Internet Commerce. 10 (2): 91–105. ISSN 1533-2861. doi:10.1080/15332861.2011.571990. 
^ a b c d e f g h i j Fill, Chris; Hughes, Graham; De Francessco, Scott (2013). Advertising Strategy, Creativity and Media. London: Pearson. 
^ Finne, Åke; Grönroos, Christian (2009-07-01). "Rethinking marketing communication: From integrated marketing communication to relationship communication". Journal of Marketing Communications. 15 (2-3): 179–195. ISSN 1352-7266. doi:10.1080/13527260902757654. 
^ a b c d Dahlen, M., Lange, F., & Smith, T (2010). Marketing communications: A brand narrative approach. West Sussex, UK: John Wiley & Sons. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ a b Muller, Richard; Wergin, Rand (2012). "A case study in marketing communications: Traditional vs e-media advertising". International Journal of the Academic Business World. 6 (1): 85–94. 
^ a b c d e f Kaplan, Andreas M.; Haenlein, Michael (2010-01-01). "Users of the world, unite! The challenges and opportunities of Social Media". Business Horizons. 53 (1): 59–68. doi:10.1016/j.bushor.2009.09.003. 
^ Barnes, James H; Reid, Leonard N; Rotfield, Herbert J (1984). "Attention to Magazine Ads as Function of Layout Design". Journalism Quarterly. 62 (2): 439–441. 
^ Weiss, David (2014). ""That's part of what we do" The Performance power of Vogue's Anna Wintour" (PDF). Journal of Magazine and New Media Research. 15 (1): 1–29. 
^ a b Kuyucu, Mihalis (October 2014). "From Analog to Digital Radio Management: The New Radio and New Media" (PDF). Online Journal of Communication and Media Technologies. 4 (4). 
^ Arens, William; Arens, Christian; Weigold, Michael (2011). Contemporary Advertising (13 ed.). McGraw-Hill Education. 
^ a b Micael Dahlén; Anton Granlund; Mikael Grenros (2009-05-01). "The consumer-perceived value of non-traditional media: effects of brand reputation, appropriateness and expense". Journal of Consumer Marketing. 26 (3): 155–163. ISSN 0736-3761. doi:10.1108/07363760910954091. 
^ Tam Duc Dinh; Khuong Ngoc Mai (2015-12-21). "Guerrilla marketing's effects on Gen Y's word-of-mouth intention – a mediation of credibility". Asia Pacific Journal of Marketing and Logistics. 28 (1): 4–22. ISSN 1355-5855. doi:10.1108/APJML-06-2015-0102. 
^ "Volkswagen's New Guerrilla Campaign Encourages People To Try The 'Fast Lane'". Creative Guerrilla Marketing. Retrieved 2016-04-01. 
^ a b c Olson, Chris (2003). "Brand touchpoints". Information Outlook. 7 (11): 38. 
^ Morgan, Tony (2011). Visual Merchandising: Window and In-Store displays for Retail. London, UK: Laurance King. 
^ Tran, Mark (2009-07-23). "Singer gets his revenge on United Airlines and soars to fame". The Guardian. ISSN 0261-3077. Retrieved 2016-04-01. 
^ sonsofmaxwell (2009-07-06), United Breaks Guitars, retrieved 2016-04-01 
^ "Marketing and advertising shift to where the eyeballs are - online". The Sydney Morning Herald. Retrieved 2016-04-01. 
^ Dhar, Vasant; Chang, Elaine A. (2009-11-01). "Does Chatter Matter? The Impact of User-Generated Content on Music Sales". Journal of Interactive Marketing. 23 (4): 300–307. doi:10.1016/j.intmar.2009.07.004. 
^ a b "Opinion leaders, formers & followers". evconsumerbehaviour. 
^ a b Elliot, D. "Is your brand bland or grand". 
^ McCorkell (1997). Direct and Database Marketing. 
^ Tapp, J. "The strategic value of direct marketing: what are we good at?". Journal of Database Marketing (9): 9–15. 
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l Cant, M; Strydom, J; Jooste, C; du Plessis, P (2006). Marketing Management (Fifth ed.). Cape Town, South Africa: Juta & Co Ltd. p. 458. 
^ Kitchen, Phillip J; Pelsmacker, Patrick De (2004). Integrated Marketing Communications: A Primer. London: Routledge. 
^ "Marketing Communication Mix: Promote Effectively". Inevitable Steps. June 12, 2015. Retrieved February 4, 2016. 




Kusumawati, R. D., Oswari, T., Utomo, R. B., & Kumar, V. (2014). The Influence of 7P's of Marketing Mix on Buying Intention of Music Product in Indonesia. Procedia Engineering, 97, 1765-1771.
Dahlen, M., Lange, F., & Smith, T. (2010). Two-step flow communication process [Figure 3]. Retrieved from https://autonline.aut.ac.nz/bbcswebdav/pid-3617607-dt-content-rid-6697168_3/orgs/BUS_BK_MARKETIns/603/Dahlen_w2.pdf[permanent dead link]

External links[edit]

The Journal of Integrated Marketing Communications
Consolidated ICC Code of Advertising and Marketing Communication Practice





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Marketing_communications&oldid=791305487"					
Categories: Promotion and marketing communicationsMarketing terminologyTypes of marketingHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles to be merged from January 2017All articles to be mergedArticles to be merged from May 2016Articles needing additional references from April 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing style editing from January 2017All articles needing style editingWikipedia articles needing reorganization from January 2017Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017All Wikipedia articles needing clarification 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaEspañolBahasa IndonesiaעבריתLatviešu日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 11:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










product是什么意思_product的翻译_音标_读音_用法_例句_爱词霸在线词典

           小程序                            清除     最新热词                历史记录                    划译    划译      下载词霸Mac版     




                        product                    



英 [ˈprɒdʌkt]



美 [ˈprɑdʌkt]
















                                            考研                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                         /                                         

                                                                                        CET6                                                                                                                                                                                                                             /                                         

                                                                                                                                    CET4                                                                                                                                                                                 /                                         







n.

产品；
结果；
乘积；
作品




变形

复数：
                                products 




















                        一键安装桌面版，查词翻译快三倍
                    








选择要添加的生词本

















                            新建生词本
                        

                            进入生词本
                            






    双语例句 句式用法 权威例句                   查看更多             来自《权威词典》     查看更多                查看更多       四级真题 六级真题        自2010年至今的四级考试中，  共出现过  次            自2010年至今的六级考试中，  共出现过  次           


柯林斯高阶英汉双解学习词典







1


N-COUNT
产品；制品
A product is something that is produced and sold in large quantities, often as a result of a manufacturing process.





Try to get the best product at the lowest price...


尽量以最低的价格买到最好的产品。






South Korea's imports of consumer products jumped 33% in this year.


今年，韩国消费产品的进口激增了33%。





2


N-COUNT
产物
If you say that someone or something is a product of a situation or process, you mean that the situation or process has had a significant effect in making them what they are.





We are all products of our time...


我们都是这个时代的产物。






The bank is the product of a 1971 merger of two Japanese banks.


这家银行是由两家日本银行于1971年合并而成。







  牛津词典 金山词霸客户端产品已经全面收录牛津词典       牛津词典免费送   点击下载    词霸Android版  牛津词典免费使用! 立刻扫码下载   词霸iOS版  牛津词典免费使用! 立刻扫码下载       词根词缀 词组搭配        {{item.type}}: {{item.type_value}} {{item.type_exp}}                           常用词组                                同义词 同义词解析 反义词                                                                                 英英词典 英汉双向大词典                                                   释义相关词条：                                    汉语词典           繁体  笔画  造字法    首部  五笔  结构         释义      构成    例句    同义词    反义词         释义    例句      同义词    反义词                           网络释义       常用词组              相关词条                  行业词典                     百科             查看更多  本内容来源于            查看更多  本内容来源于              今日热词 热门搜索         你好   海龟   allude   海归   空气污染   regularly   志愿者   tendency   test   explicitly        阅卷笔录   孙中山   宋慧乔   家庭软暴力   海警   duck feather   天下第一泉   ecotour   干菜类   我是特种兵         创建新的生词本     i该生词本已经创建啦!  i不可以出现中文，英文，数字之外的符号哒!  i生词本名称长度不能大于24字符!  i请填写生词本名称!  取消 创建         每日一句                       精彩推荐               爱词霸查词为您提供在线翻译、英语翻译、英文翻译、英译汉、汉译英、fanyi等权威在线翻译服务！  京ICP证100054号    新出网证<京>字011号 京网文【2014】0937-238号 京ICP备06025896号 京公网安备        一键安装词霸桌面版，释义更精准，速度快三倍！ 点击下载      


All Products | GE.com

















































PRODUCT LIST

Appliances for BusinessAll Appliance ProductsAppliance Filters & Accessories CooktopsDishwashersDryersGE Artistry SeriesGE Café SeriesGE MonogramGE Profile SeriesMicrowavesRefrigeratorsRangesSmall Appliances Wall Ovens WashersWater Heaters AviationAviation Services Aviation Systems Business & General Aviation Commercial EnginesGE Capital Aviation Services (GECAS) Marine EnginesMilitary Engines CapitalCommercial Lending & Leasing Consumer FinancingEnergy Financial ServicesGE Capital Aviation ServicesReal Estate FinancingRetail Financing  Consumer Electronics From GEJASCO ProductsCritical PowerAC/DC Power SuppliesAutomatic Transfer SwitchesCritical Power DistributionCustom CapabilitiesDC Power ServicesDistributionInvertersIsolated DC/DC ConvertersLarge Power PlantsManagement SoftwareMedium Power PlantsNon-Isolated DC/DC ConvertersParalleling SwitchgearPower Quality ServicesRetrofit Power SolutionsSmall Power PlantsStatic Transfer SwitchesSurge Protective DevicesUPS Global Services  UPS - Single PhaseUPS – Three Phase DigitalAviationHealthcareManufacturingMiningOil & GasPower DistributionPower GenerationPredix™ Platform for Industrial Internet RailWaterWind Digital Energy Grid ModernizationCapacitorsDistribution AutomationDistribution Management Systems (ADMS)Electrical Balance of Plant (EBoP)Energy Management Systems (EMS)Fiber Optic MultiplexingFlexible AC transmission systems (FACTS)Gas Insulated Switchgear (GIS)Geospatial & Mobile Systems HV/MV Power EquipmentOutage & Storm Management SystemsPower Metering & PQ MonitoringProtection & Control Smart Meters Substation AutomationTransformer Fleet ManagementTransformer Monitoring & DiagnosticsTransformersWireless CommunicationsEnergy ConnectionsAutomation & Process ControlControlsCritical PowerDrivesElectrical DistributionGeospatial SystemsHigh Voltage EquipmentIndustrial CommunicationsMonitoring & DiagnosticsMotors and GeneratorsPower ConversionProtection & ControlSmart MeteringSubstation AutomationUtility Operation SystemsPower Project Consulting ServicesGlobal Power Projects OverviewPower Systems StabilizersSub-Synchronous Torsional Interaction Analysis and Risk MitigationGrid Code TestingRenewables Application IssuesTorsional Stress Relay GE Appliances for ConsumersAll Appliance ProductsCooktopsDishwashersDryersFilters & AccessoriesGE Artistry SeriesGE Café SeriesGE MonogramGE Profile SeriesMicrowavesRangesRefrigeratorsWall OvensWashersWater HeatersService & SupportHealthcareGE Blueprint For Low Dose GE HealthcareGE Healthcare Education GE Healthcare Life Sciences GE Healthcare Products GE Healthcare Services GE Healthcare Specialties Home ImprovementAvantaPure®HomespringHome Standby Generator SystemsPro Elite™ Sealants Industrial SolutionsArc Flash SolutionsBuswayCircuit BreakersContactorsConversion Kits and Trip UnitsCritical PowerDrivesEV ChargingLighting ControlLoad CentersMeteringModular MeteringMotor Control CentersOverload RelaysPanelboards Power Equipment BuildingsPush Buttons & Pilot DevicesRelays & Timers - ControlStartersServicesSolenoids & Limit SwitchesSurge SuppressionSwitchboardsSwitchgear Switches & DisconnectsTerminal Blocks TransformersIntelligent PlatformsIndustrial AutomationControl SystemsHMI/SCADA SoftwareOperator Interfaces & Panel PCsIndustrial ComputersData & AnalyticsData ManagementAdvanced AnalyticsManufacturing SoftwareIndustrial Performance and Reliability CenterEquipment Insight for OEMsEmbedded SystemsSingle Board ComputersHigh Performance Embedded ComputingSensor & Image ProcessingAvionicsNetwork CommunicationsGraphics and VideoRugged Systems & SolutionsLighting for BusinessAll Business LightingBallasts & DriversControl SystemsHazardous LocationIndoor FixturesLED Lamps & ModulesNon-LED LampsOutdoor FixturesRefit Solutions / LED TubesRefrigerated DisplaySignageTransportation Lighting for ConsumersAll Consumer LightingAutomotiveDecorativeGeneral PurposeHoliday LightingLinear FluorescentOutdoorSpecialtyTrack & RecessedVanity & PendantMiningControls and Industrial AutomationMining [PDF]Mining Data and Analytics SoftwareMining EquipmentMining Infrastructure	Mining Power ConversionMining Power DistributionMining Productivity SolutionsMining Water TreatmentOil & GasDistributed Gas DistributionDistributed Gas ProcessingDistributed Gas ProductionDrilling Measurement SolutionsLogging ServicesOffshore DrillingOnshore DrillingLNG Balance Of PlantLNG Gas LiquefactionOilfield Artificial LiftOilfield Gas Processing CompressionOilfield ProductionOilfield Power GenerationSurface Flow ControlSurface Well ControlDownstream PipelineGas ProductionPipeline Integrity ServicesVirtual PipelineRefinery & PetrochemicalFlexible Pipe SolutionsOffshore ProductionOffshore TurbomachinerySubsea Power And ProcessingSubsea Production Control SystemsSubsea ServicesSubsea Trees, Manifolds And Connection SystemsSubsea Wellheads And Connector PipesWellheads And Flow ControlWireline Technology Personal HealthcareGE DiabetesPower Controls and Automation for Heavy Duty Power GenerationControls and Automation for WaterGas Engines — Gas Compression Gas Engines — Distributed Power - Power GenerationGas Turbines — Aeroderivative Gas Turbines – Heavy Duty & Combined Cycle – Power Generation GasificationGeneratorsNuclear Energy Solar Power Steam Turbines Water Treatment Wind Turbines Power ConversionBrilliance LV DriveCompact PodsCylindrical High Speed RotorsDiesel and Gas Engine Driven GeneratorsDirect Drive Wind Turbine Generators Doubly Fed Induction Wind Turbine GeneratorsDynamic SVC DrivesFlameproof Induction MotorsGas and Steam Turbine Driven GeneratorsHigh Performance Controller (HPCi)High Speed MotorsHydro GeneratorsHV Wound Rotor Induction MotorsIncident ReportingIEEE 841 X$D Ultra Laminated Salient Pole Rotors Large Pods Large Slow Speed Marine MotorsLow Voltage Induction MotorsLV7000 Low Voltage DriveLV8000 DriveMV & HV Cage Induction MotorsMV & HV TEFC Induction MotorsMV3000 LV DriveMV4 DrivesMV7000 Drives NEMA Premium Efficient X$D Ultra Power Electronic Controller (PECe)ProCrane LV DriveProMarine LV Drive ProWind LV DriveRemote Support & DiagnosticsSD 7000 – LCI DrivesSmall DC Motors SEMIPOL MV DriveSolid Salient Pole Rotors VDM 25000 MV DriveWind Pitch Motors  Power EconomicsPower Economics OverviewElectricity Market Design, Assessment, and AnalysisSustainability, Climate Change, and Energy Policy AnalysisTransmission and Generation Asset Valuation and Project Pro-FormasDemand-Side Resource/Demand Response Evaluation and AnalysisPower Systems Operation & PlanningPower Systems Operation & Planning OverviewSecure Islanding of Power Plants - System Stability AnalysisReactive Power AdequacyT&D Long-range PlanningEquipment, Switchgear and Arrester ApplicationDSTAR - Distribution R&D for Today's Utility EnvironmentDistribution Automation and Smart Grid AnalysisIndustrial Protection and Control Application, Fast Load-Shed SchemesDistributed Generation Impact StudiesUtility IT & Grid Modernization ProjectsPower Systems Software ProductsSoftware Products OverviewPSLFPSLF TrainingMAPSMARSDSTAR Software Tool TransportationAll Services Diesel Marine Power Diesel Stationary Power Drilling Motors Energy Storage LocomotivesRailway Signaling, Control & Communication Software 








See how GE Works



 
GE Advantage
Across GE, we pride ourselves on driving rigor, operational excellence, and enhanced customer value. That’s why we’re placing some big bets on nearly 40 high impact projects that will help increase our speed to market, improve the quality of our products and services, significantly reduce costs, and drive competitive advantage for our customer and our company. It’s called GE Advantage, and it is changing the way we do business.
Learn More

 



 
Customer Training
GE services support a number of key industries globally. Our training packages include a complete range of content from business specific to leadership and education, leveraging our 50-plus years of experience and the latest available technologies.
Learn More



 




























Telecommunication - Wikipedia






















 







Telecommunication

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

Not to be confused with Teleconnection.




Earth station at the satellite communication facility in Raisting, Bavaria, Germany






Visualization from the Opte Project of the various routes through a portion of the Internet


Telecommunication is the transmission of signs, signals, messages, words, writings, images and sounds or intelligence of any nature by wire, radio, optical or other electromagnetic systems.[1][2] Telecommunication occurs when the exchange of information between communication participants includes the use of technology. It is transmitted either electrically over physical media, such as cables, or via electromagnetic radiation.[3][4][5][6][7][8] Such transmission paths are often divided into communication channels which afford the advantages of multiplexing. The term is often used in its plural form, telecommunications, because it involves many different technologies.[citation needed]
Early means of communicating over a distance included visual signals, such as beacons, smoke signals, semaphore telegraphs, signal flags, and optical heliographs.[9] Other examples of pre-modern long-distance communication included audio messages such as coded drumbeats, lung-blown horns, and loud whistles. 20th and 21st century technologies for long-distance communication usually involve electrical and electromagnetic technologies, such as telegraph, telephone, and teleprinter, networks, radio, microwave transmission, fiber optics, and communications satellites.
A revolution in wireless communication began in the first decade of the 20th century with the pioneering developments in radio communications by Guglielmo Marconi, who won the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1909. Other notable pioneering inventors and developers in the field of electrical and electronic telecommunications include Charles Wheatstone and Samuel Morse (inventors of the telegraph), Alexander Graham Bell (inventor of the telephone), Edwin Armstrong and Lee de Forest (inventors of radio), as well as Vladimir K. Zworykin, John Logie Baird and Philo Farnsworth (some of the inventors of television).



Contents


1 Etymology
2 History

2.1 Beacons and pigeons
2.2 Telegraph and telephone
2.3 Radio and television
2.4 Computers and the Internet


3 Key concepts

3.1 Basic elements
3.2 Analog versus digital communications
3.3 Telecommunication networks
3.4 Communication channels
3.5 Modulation


4 Society

4.1 Economic impact

4.1.1 Microeconomics
4.1.2 Macroeconomics


4.2 Social impact
4.3 Other impacts


5 Government
6 Modern media

6.1 Worldwide equipment sales
6.2 Telephone
6.3 Radio and television
6.4 Internet
6.5 Local area networks and wide area networks


7 Transmission capacity
8 See also
9 References

9.1 Citations
9.2 Bibliography


10 External links



Etymology[edit]
The word telecommunication is a compound of the Greek prefix tele (τηλε), meaning distant, far off, or afar,[10] and the Latin communicare, meaning to share. Its modern use is adapted from the French,[7] because its written use was recorded in 1904 by the French engineer and novelist Édouard Estaunié.[11][12] Communication was first used as an English word in the late 14th century. It comes from Old French comunicacion (14c., Modern French communication), from Latin communicationem (nominative communicatio), noun of action from past participle stem of communicare "to share, divide out; communicate, impart, inform; join, unite, participate in," literally "to make common," from communis".[13]
History[edit]
For more details on this topic, see History of telecommunication.
Beacons and pigeons[edit]




A replica of one of Chappe's semaphore towers


Homing pigeons have occasionally been used throughout history by different cultures. Pigeon post had Persian roots, and was later used by the Romans to aid their military. Frontinus said that Julius Caesar used pigeons as messengers in his conquest of Gaul.[14] The Greeks also conveyed the names of the victors at the Olympic Games to various cities using homing pigeons.[15] In the early 19th century, the Dutch government used the system in Java and Sumatra. And in 1849, Paul Julius Reuter started a pigeon service to fly stock prices between Aachen and Brussels, a service that operated for a year until the gap in the telegraph link was closed.[16]
In the Middle Ages, chains of beacons were commonly used on hilltops as a means of relaying a signal. Beacon chains suffered the drawback that they could only pass a single bit of information, so the meaning of the message such as "the enemy has been sighted" had to be agreed upon in advance. One notable instance of their use was during the Spanish Armada, when a beacon chain relayed a signal from Plymouth to London.[17]
In 1792, Claude Chappe, a French engineer, built the first fixed visual telegraphy system (or semaphore line) between Lille and Paris.[18] However semaphore suffered from the need for skilled operators and expensive towers at intervals of ten to thirty kilometres (six to nineteen miles). As a result of competition from the electrical telegraph, the last commercial line was abandoned in 1880.[19]
Telegraph and telephone[edit]
Sir Charles Wheatstone and Sir William Fothergill Cooke invented the electric telegraph in 1837.[20] Also, the first commercial electrical telegraph is purported to have been constructed by Wheatstone and Cooke and opened on 9 April 1839.[citation needed] Both inventors viewed their device as "an improvement to the [existing] electromagnetic telegraph" not as a new device.[21]
Samuel Morse independently developed a version of the electrical telegraph that he unsuccessfully demonstrated on 2 September 1837. His code was an important advance over Wheatstone's signaling method. The first transatlantic telegraph cable was successfully completed on 27 July 1866, allowing transatlantic telecommunication for the first time.[22]
The conventional telephone was invented independently by Alexander Bell and Elisha Gray in 1876.[23] Antonio Meucci invented the first device that allowed the electrical transmission of voice over a line in 1849. However Meucci's device was of little practical value because it relied upon the electrophonic effect and thus required users to place the receiver in their mouth to "hear" what was being said.[24] The first commercial telephone services were set-up in 1878 and 1879 on both sides of the Atlantic in the cities of New Haven and London.[25][26]
Radio and television[edit]
In 1832, James Lindsay gave a classroom demonstration of wireless telegraphy to his students. By 1854, he was able to demonstrate a transmission across the Firth of Tay from Dundee, Scotland to Woodhaven, a distance of two miles (3 km), using water as the transmission medium.[27] In December 1901, Guglielmo Marconi established wireless communication between St. John's, Newfoundland (Canada) and Poldhu, Cornwall (England), earning him the 1909 Nobel Prize in physics (which he shared with Karl Braun).[28] However small-scale radio communication had already been demonstrated in 1893 by Nikola Tesla in a presentation to the National Electric Light Association.[29]
On 25 March 1925, John Logie Baird was able to demonstrate the transmission of moving pictures at the London department store Selfridges. Baird's device relied upon the Nipkow disk and thus became known as the mechanical television. It formed the basis of experimental broadcasts done by the British Broadcasting Corporation beginning 30 September 1929.[30] However, for most of the twentieth century televisions depended upon the cathode ray tube invented by Karl Braun. The first version of such a television to show promise was produced by Philo Farnsworth and demonstrated to his family on 7 September 1927.[31]
Computers and the Internet[edit]
On 11 September 1940, George Stibitz transmitted problems for his Complex Number Calculator in New York using a teletype, and received the computed results back at Dartmouth College in New Hampshire.[32] This configuration of a centralized computer (mainframe) with remote dumb terminals remained popular well into the 1970s. However, already in the 1960s, researchers started to investigate packet switching, a technology that sends a message in portions to its destination asynchronously without passing it through a centralized mainframe. A four-node network emerged on 5 December 1969, constituting the beginnings of the ARPANET, which by 1981 had grown to 213 nodes.[33] ARPANET eventually merged with other networks to form the Internet. While Internet development was a focus of the Internet Engineering Task Force (IETF) who published a series of Request for Comment documents, other networking advancement occurred in industrial laboratories, such as the local area network (LAN) developments of Ethernet (1983) and the token ring protocol (1984).
Key concepts[edit]
Modern telecommunication is founded on a series of key concepts that experienced progressive development and refinement in a period of well over a century.
Basic elements[edit]
Telecommunication technologies may primarily be divided into wired and wireless methods. Overall though, a basic telecommunication system consists of three main parts that are always present in some form or another:

A transmitter that takes information and converts it to a signal.
A transmission medium, also called the physical channel that carries the signal. An example of this is the "free space channel".
A receiver that takes the signal from the channel and converts it back into usable information for the recipient.

For example, in a radio broadcasting station the station's large power amplifier is the transmitter; and the broadcasting antenna is the interface between the power amplifier and the "free space channel". The free space channel is the transmission medium; and the receiver's antenna is the interface between the free space channel and the receiver. Next, the radio receiver is the destination of the radio signal, and this is where it is converted from electricity to sound for people to listen to.
Sometimes, telecommunication systems are "duplex" (two-way systems) with a single box of electronics working as both the transmitter and a receiver, or a transceiver. For example, a cellular telephone is a transceiver.[34] The transmission electronics and the receiver electronics within a transceiver are actually quite independent of each other. This can be readily explained by the fact that radio transmitters contain power amplifiers that operate with electrical powers measured in watts or kilowatts, but radio receivers deal with radio powers that are measured in the microwatts or nanowatts. Hence, transceivers have to be carefully designed and built to isolate their high-power circuitry and their low-power circuitry from each other, as to not cause interference.
Telecommunication over fixed lines is called point-to-point communication because it is between one transmitter and one receiver. Telecommunication through radio broadcasts is called broadcast communication because it is between one powerful transmitter and numerous low-power but sensitive radio receivers.[34]
Telecommunications in which multiple transmitters and multiple receivers have been designed to cooperate and to share the same physical channel are called multiplex systems. The sharing of physical channels using multiplexing often gives very large reductions in costs. Multiplexed systems are laid out in telecommunication networks, and the multiplexed signals are switched at nodes through to the correct destination terminal receiver.
Analog versus digital communications[edit]
Communications signals can be sent either by analog signals or digital signals. There are analog communication systems and digital communication systems. For an analog signal, the signal is varied continuously with respect to the information. In a digital signal, the information is encoded as a set of discrete values (for example, a set of ones and zeros). During the propagation and reception, the information contained in analog signals will inevitably be degraded by undesirable physical noise. (The output of a transmitter is noise-free for all practical purposes.) Commonly, the noise in a communication system can be expressed as adding or subtracting from the desirable signal in a completely random way. This form of noise is called additive noise, with the understanding that the noise can be negative or positive at different instants of time. Noise that is not additive noise is a much more difficult situation to describe or analyze, and these other kinds of noise will be omitted here.
On the other hand, unless the additive noise disturbance exceeds a certain threshold, the information contained in digital signals will remain intact. Their resistance to noise represents a key advantage of digital signals over analog signals.[35]
Telecommunication networks[edit]
A telecommunications network is a collection of transmitters, receivers, and communications channels that send messages to one another. Some digital communications networks contain one or more routers that work together to transmit information to the correct user. An analog communications network consists of one or more switches that establish a connection between two or more users. For both types of network, repeaters may be necessary to amplify or recreate the signal when it is being transmitted over long distances. This is to combat attenuation that can render the signal indistinguishable from the noise.[36] Another advantage of digital systems over analog is that their output is easier to store in memory, i.e. two voltage states (high and low) are easier to store than a continuous range of states.
Communication channels[edit]
The term "channel" has two different meanings. In one meaning, a channel is the physical medium that carries a signal between the transmitter and the receiver. Examples of this include the atmosphere for sound communications, glass optical fibers for some kinds of optical communications, coaxial cables for communications by way of the voltages and electric currents in them, and free space for communications using visible light, infrared waves, ultraviolet light, and radio waves. This last channel is called the "free space channel". The sending of radio waves from one place to another has nothing to do with the presence or absence of an atmosphere between the two. Radio waves travel through a perfect vacuum just as easily as they travel through air, fog, clouds, or any other kind of gas.
The other meaning of the term "channel" in telecommunications is seen in the phrase communications channel, which is a subdivision of a transmission medium so that it can be used to send multiple streams of information simultaneously. For example, one radio station can broadcast radio waves into free space at frequencies in the neighborhood of 94.5 MHz (megahertz) while another radio station can simultaneously broadcast radio waves at frequencies in the neighborhood of 96.1 MHz. Each radio station would transmit radio waves over a frequency bandwidth of about 180 kHz (kilohertz), centered at frequencies such as the above, which are called the "carrier frequencies". Each station in this example is separated from its adjacent stations by 200 kHz, and the difference between 200 kHz and 180 kHz (20 kHz) is an engineering allowance for the imperfections in the communication system.
In the example above, the "free space channel" has been divided into communications channels according to frequencies, and each channel is assigned a separate frequency bandwidth in which to broadcast radio waves. This system of dividing the medium into channels according to frequency is called "frequency-division multiplexing". Another term for the same concept is "wavelength-division multiplexing", which is more commonly used in optical communications when multiple transmitters share the same physical medium.
Another way of dividing a communications medium into channels is to allocate each sender a recurring segment of time (a "time slot", for example, 20 milliseconds out of each second), and to allow each sender to send messages only within its own time slot. This method of dividing the medium into communication channels is called "time-division multiplexing" (TDM), and is used in optical fiber communication. Some radio communication systems use TDM within an allocated FDM channel. Hence, these systems use a hybrid of TDM and FDM.
Modulation[edit]
The shaping of a signal to convey information is known as modulation. Modulation can be used to represent a digital message as an analog waveform. This is commonly called "keying" – a term derived from the older use of Morse Code in telecommunications – and several keying techniques exist (these include phase-shift keying, frequency-shift keying, and amplitude-shift keying). The "Bluetooth" system, for example, uses phase-shift keying to exchange information between various devices.[37][38] In addition, there are combinations of phase-shift keying and amplitude-shift keying which is called (in the jargon of the field) "quadrature amplitude modulation" (QAM) that are used in high-capacity digital radio communication systems.
Modulation can also be used to transmit the information of low-frequency analog signals at higher frequencies. This is helpful because low-frequency analog signals cannot be effectively transmitted over free space. Hence the information from a low-frequency analog signal must be impressed into a higher-frequency signal (known as the "carrier wave") before transmission. There are several different modulation schemes available to achieve this [two of the most basic being amplitude modulation (AM) and frequency modulation (FM)]. An example of this process is a disc jockey's voice being impressed into a 96 MHz carrier wave using frequency modulation (the voice would then be received on a radio as the channel "96 FM").[39] In addition, modulation has the advantage that it may use frequency division multiplexing (FDM).
Society[edit]
Telecommunication has a significant social, cultural and economic impact on modern society. In 2008, estimates placed the telecommunication industry's revenue at $4.7 trillion or just under 3 percent of the gross world product (official exchange rate).[40] Several following sections discuss the impact of telecommunication on society.
Economic impact[edit]
Microeconomics[edit]
On the microeconomic scale, companies have used telecommunications to help build global business empires. This is self-evident in the case of online retailer Amazon.com but, according to academic Edward Lenert, even the conventional retailer Walmart has benefited from better telecommunication infrastructure compared to its competitors.[41] In cities throughout the world, home owners use their telephones to order and arrange a variety of home services ranging from pizza deliveries to electricians. Even relatively poor communities have been noted to use telecommunication to their advantage. In Bangladesh's Narshingdi district, isolated villagers use cellular phones to speak directly to wholesalers and arrange a better price for their goods. In Côte d'Ivoire, coffee growers share mobile phones to follow hourly variations in coffee prices and sell at the best price.[42]
Macroeconomics[edit]
On the macroeconomic scale, Lars-Hendrik Röller and Leonard Waverman suggested a causal link between good telecommunication infrastructure and economic growth.[43][44] Few dispute the existence of a correlation although some argue it is wrong to view the relationship as causal.[45]
Because of the economic benefits of good telecommunication infrastructure, there is increasing worry about the inequitable access to telecommunication services amongst various countries of the world—this is known as the digital divide. A 2003 survey by the International Telecommunication Union (ITU) revealed that roughly a third of countries have fewer than one mobile subscription for every 20 people and one-third of countries have fewer than one land-line telephone subscription for every 20 people. In terms of Internet access, roughly half of all countries have fewer than one out of 20 people with Internet access. From this information, as well as educational data, the ITU was able to compile an index that measures the overall ability of citizens to access and use information and communication technologies.[46] Using this measure, Sweden, Denmark and Iceland received the highest ranking while the African countries Nigeria, Burkina Faso and Mali received the lowest.[47]
Social impact[edit]
Telecommunication has played a significant role in social relationships. Nevertheless, devices like the telephone system were originally advertised with an emphasis on the practical dimensions of the device (such as the ability to conduct business or order home services) as opposed to the social dimensions. It was not until the late 1920s and 1930s that the social dimensions of the device became a prominent theme in telephone advertisements. New promotions started appealing to consumers' emotions, stressing the importance of social conversations and staying connected to family and friends.[48]
Since then the role that telecommunications has played in social relations has become increasingly important. In recent years, the popularity of social networking sites has increased dramatically. These sites allow users to communicate with each other as well as post photographs, events and profiles for others to see. The profiles can list a person's age, interests, sexual preference and relationship status. In this way, these sites can play important role in everything from organising social engagements to courtship.[49]
Prior to social networking sites, technologies like short message service (SMS) and the telephone also had a significant impact on social interactions. In 2000, market research group Ipsos MORI reported that 81% of 15- to 24-year-old SMS users in the United Kingdom had used the service to coordinate social arrangements and 42% to flirt.[50]
Other impacts[edit]


News source preference
of Americans in 2006.[51]


Local TV
59%


National TV
47%


Radio
44%


Local paper
38%


Internet
23%


National paper
12%


Survey permitted multiple answers


In cultural terms, telecommunication has increased the public's ability to access music and film. With television, people can watch films they have not seen before in their own home without having to travel to the video store or cinema. With radio and the Internet, people can listen to music they have not heard before without having to travel to the music store.
Telecommunication has also transformed the way people receive their news. A 2006 survey (right table) of slightly more than 3,000 Americans by the non-profit Pew Internet and American Life Project in the United States the majority specified television or radio over newspapers.
Telecommunication has had an equally significant impact on advertising. TNS Media Intelligence reported that in 2007, 58% of advertising expenditure in the United States was spent on media that depend upon telecommunication.[52]


Advertising expenditures in US in 2007


Medium

Spending


Internet
7.6%
$11.31 billion


Radio
7.2%
$10.69 billion


Cable TV
12.1%
$18.02 billion


Syndicated TV
2.8%
$4.17 billion


Spot TV
11.3%
$16.82 billion


Network TV
17.1%
$25.42 billion


Newspaper
18.9%
$28.22 billion


Magazine
20.4%
$30.33 billion


Outdoor
2.7%
$4.02 billion


Total
100%
$149 billion


Government[edit]
Many countries have enacted legislation which conforms to the International Telecommunication Regulations established by the International Telecommunication Union (ITU), which is the "leading UN agency for information and communication technology issues."[53] In 1947, at the Atlantic City Conference, the ITU decided to "afford international protection to all frequencies registered in a new international frequency list and used in conformity with the Radio Regulation." According to the ITU's Radio Regulations adopted in Atlantic City, all frequencies referenced in the International Frequency Registration Board, examined by the board and registered on the International Frequency List "shall have the right to international protection from harmful interference."[54]
From a global perspective, there have been political debates and legislation regarding the management of telecommunication and broadcasting. The history of broadcasting discusses some debates in relation to balancing conventional communication such as printing and telecommunication such as radio broadcasting.[55] The onset of World War II brought on the first explosion of international broadcasting propaganda.[55] Countries, their governments, insurgents, terrorists, and militiamen have all used telecommunication and broadcasting techniques to promote propaganda.[55][56] Patriotic propaganda for political movements and colonization started the mid-1930s. In 1936, the BBC broadcast propaganda to the Arab World to partly counter similar broadcasts from Italy, which also had colonial interests in North Africa.[55]
Modern insurgents, such as those in the latest Iraq war, often use intimidating telephone calls, SMSs and the distribution of sophisticated videos of an attack on coalition troops within hours of the operation. "The Sunni insurgents even have their own television station, Al-Zawraa, which while banned by the Iraqi government, still broadcasts from Erbil, Iraqi Kurdistan, even as coalition pressure has forced it to switch satellite hosts several times."[56]
On 10 November 2014, President Obama recommended the Federal Communications Commission reclassify broadband Internet service as a telecommunications service in order to preserve net neutrality.[57][58]
Modern media[edit]
Worldwide equipment sales[edit]
According to data collected by Gartner[59][60] and Ars Technica[61] sales of main consumer's telecommunication equipment worldwide in millions of units was:


Equipment / year
1975
1980
1985
1990
1994
1996
1998
2000
2002
2004
2006
2008


Computers
0
1
8
20
40
75
100
135
130
175
230
280


Cell phones
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
180
400
420
660
830
1000


Telephone[edit]




Optical fiber provides cheaper bandwidth for long distance communication.


In a telephone network, the caller is connected to the person they want to talk to by switches at various telephone exchanges. The switches form an electrical connection between the two users and the setting of these switches is determined electronically when the caller dials the number. Once the connection is made, the caller's voice is transformed to an electrical signal using a small microphone in the caller's handset. This electrical signal is then sent through the network to the user at the other end where it is transformed back into sound by a small speaker in that person's handset.
The landline telephones in most residential homes are analog—that is, the speaker's voice directly determines the signal's voltage.[citation needed] Although short-distance calls may be handled from end-to-end as analog signals, increasingly telephone service providers are transparently converting the signals to digital signals for transmission. The advantage of this is that digitized voice data can travel side-by-side with data from the Internet and can be perfectly reproduced in long distance communication (as opposed to analog signals that are inevitably impacted by noise).
Mobile phones have had a significant impact on telephone networks. Mobile phone subscriptions now outnumber fixed-line subscriptions in many markets. Sales of mobile phones in 2005 totalled 816.6 million with that figure being almost equally shared amongst the markets of Asia/Pacific (204 m), Western Europe (164 m), CEMEA (Central Europe, the Middle East and Africa) (153.5 m), North America (148 m) and Latin America (102 m).[62] In terms of new subscriptions over the five years from 1999, Africa has outpaced other markets with 58.2% growth.[63] Increasingly these phones are being serviced by systems where the voice content is transmitted digitally such as GSM or W-CDMA with many markets choosing to deprecate analog systems such as AMPS.[64]
There have also been dramatic changes in telephone communication behind the scenes. Starting with the operation of TAT-8 in 1988, the 1990s saw the widespread adoption of systems based on optical fibers. The benefit of communicating with optic fibers is that they offer a drastic increase in data capacity. TAT-8 itself was able to carry 10 times as many telephone calls as the last copper cable laid at that time and today's optic fibre cables are able to carry 25 times as many telephone calls as TAT-8.[65] This increase in data capacity is due to several factors: First, optic fibres are physically much smaller than competing technologies. Second, they do not suffer from crosstalk which means several hundred of them can be easily bundled together in a single cable.[66] Lastly, improvements in multiplexing have led to an exponential growth in the data capacity of a single fibre.[67][68]
Assisting communication across many modern optic fibre networks is a protocol known as Asynchronous Transfer Mode (ATM). The ATM protocol allows for the side-by-side data transmission mentioned in the second paragraph. It is suitable for public telephone networks because it establishes a pathway for data through the network and associates a traffic contract with that pathway. The traffic contract is essentially an agreement between the client and the network about how the network is to handle the data; if the network cannot meet the conditions of the traffic contract it does not accept the connection. This is important because telephone calls can negotiate a contract so as to guarantee themselves a constant bit rate, something that will ensure a caller's voice is not delayed in parts or cut off completely.[69] There are competitors to ATM, such as Multiprotocol Label Switching (MPLS), that perform a similar task and are expected to supplant ATM in the future.[70][71]
Radio and television[edit]
Main articles: Radio, Television, and Broadcasting




Digital television standards and their adoption worldwide


In a broadcast system, the central high-powered broadcast tower transmits a high-frequency electromagnetic wave to numerous low-powered receivers. The high-frequency wave sent by the tower is modulated with a signal containing visual or audio information. The receiver is then tuned so as to pick up the high-frequency wave and a demodulator is used to retrieve the signal containing the visual or audio information. The broadcast signal can be either analog (signal is varied continuously with respect to the information) or digital (information is encoded as a set of discrete values).[34][72]
The broadcast media industry is at a critical turning point in its development, with many countries moving from analog to digital broadcasts. This move is made possible by the production of cheaper, faster and more capable integrated circuits. The chief advantage of digital broadcasts is that they prevent a number of complaints common to traditional analog broadcasts. For television, this includes the elimination of problems such as snowy pictures, ghosting and other distortion. These occur because of the nature of analog transmission, which means that perturbations due to noise will be evident in the final output. Digital transmission overcomes this problem because digital signals are reduced to discrete values upon reception and hence small perturbations do not affect the final output. In a simplified example, if a binary message 1011 was transmitted with signal amplitudes [1.0 0.0 1.0 1.0] and received with signal amplitudes [0.9 0.2 1.1 0.9] it would still decode to the binary message 1011 — a perfect reproduction of what was sent. From this example, a problem with digital transmissions can also be seen in that if the noise is great enough it can significantly alter the decoded message. Using forward error correction a receiver can correct a handful of bit errors in the resulting message but too much noise will lead to incomprehensible output and hence a breakdown of the transmission.[73][74]
In digital television broadcasting, there are three competing standards that are likely to be adopted worldwide. These are the ATSC, DVB and ISDB standards; the adoption of these standards thus far is presented in the captioned map. All three standards use MPEG-2 for video compression. ATSC uses Dolby Digital AC-3 for audio compression, ISDB uses Advanced Audio Coding (MPEG-2 Part 7) and DVB has no standard for audio compression but typically uses MPEG-1 Part 3 Layer 2.[75][76] The choice of modulation also varies between the schemes. In digital audio broadcasting, standards are much more unified with practically all countries choosing to adopt the Digital Audio Broadcasting standard (also known as the Eureka 147 standard). The exception is the United States which has chosen to adopt HD Radio. HD Radio, unlike Eureka 147, is based upon a transmission method known as in-band on-channel transmission that allows digital information to "piggyback" on normal AM or FM analog transmissions.[77]
However, despite the pending switch to digital, analog television remains being transmitted in most countries. An exception is the United States that ended analog television transmission (by all but the very low-power TV stations) on 12 June 2009[78] after twice delaying the switchover deadline,Kenya also ended analog television transmission in December 2014 after multiple delays. For analog television, there are three standards in use for broadcasting color TV (see a map on adoption here). These are known as PAL (German designed), NTSC (North American designed), and SECAM (French designed). (It is important to understand that these are the ways of sending color TV, and they do not have anything to do with the standards for black & white TV, which also vary from country to country.) For analog radio, the switch to digital radio is made more difficult by the fact that analog receivers are sold at a small fraction of the price of digital receivers.[79][80] The choice of modulation for analog radio is typically between amplitude (AM) or frequency modulation (FM). To achieve stereo playback, an amplitude modulated subcarrier is used for stereo FM.
Internet[edit]




The OSI reference model


The Internet is a worldwide network of computers and computer networks that communicate with each other using the Internet Protocol.[81] Any computer on the Internet has a unique IP address that can be used by other computers to route information to it. Hence, any computer on the Internet can send a message to any other computer using its IP address. These messages carry with them the originating computer's IP address allowing for two-way communication. The Internet is thus an exchange of messages between computers.[82]
It is estimated that the 51% of the information flowing through two-way telecommunications networks in the year 2000 were flowing through the Internet (most of the rest (42%) through the landline telephone). By the year 2007 the Internet clearly dominated and captured 97% of all the information in telecommunication networks (most of the rest (2%) through mobile phones).[83] As of 2008[update], an estimated 21.9% of the world population has access to the Internet with the highest access rates (measured as a percentage of the population) in North America (73.6%), Oceania/Australia (59.5%) and Europe (48.1%).[84] In terms of broadband access, Iceland (26.7%), South Korea (25.4%) and the Netherlands (25.3%) led the world.[85]
The Internet works in part because of protocols that govern how the computers and routers communicate with each other. The nature of computer network communication lends itself to a layered approach where individual protocols in the protocol stack run more-or-less independently of other protocols. This allows lower-level protocols to be customized for the network situation while not changing the way higher-level protocols operate. A practical example of why this is important is because it allows an Internet browser to run the same code regardless of whether the computer it is running on is connected to the Internet through an Ethernet or Wi-Fi connection. Protocols are often talked about in terms of their place in the OSI reference model (pictured on the right), which emerged in 1983 as the first step in an unsuccessful attempt to build a universally adopted networking protocol suite.[86]
For the Internet, the physical medium and data link protocol can vary several times as packets traverse the globe. This is because the Internet places no constraints on what physical medium or data link protocol is used. This leads to the adoption of media and protocols that best suit the local network situation. In practice, most intercontinental communication will use the Asynchronous Transfer Mode (ATM) protocol (or a modern equivalent) on top of optic fiber. This is because for most intercontinental communication the Internet shares the same infrastructure as the public switched telephone network.
At the network layer, things become standardized with the Internet Protocol (IP) being adopted for logical addressing. For the World Wide Web, these "IP addresses" are derived from the human readable form using the Domain Name System (e.g. 72.14.207.99 is derived from www.google.com). At the moment, the most widely used version of the Internet Protocol is version four but a move to version six is imminent.[87]
At the transport layer, most communication adopts either the Transmission Control Protocol (TCP) or the User Datagram Protocol (UDP). TCP is used when it is essential every message sent is received by the other computer whereas UDP is used when it is merely desirable. With TCP, packets are retransmitted if they are lost and placed in order before they are presented to higher layers. With UDP, packets are not ordered or retransmitted if lost. Both TCP and UDP packets carry port numbers with them to specify what application or process the packet should be handled by.[88] Because certain application-level protocols use certain ports, network administrators can manipulate traffic to suit particular requirements. Examples are to restrict Internet access by blocking the traffic destined for a particular port or to affect the performance of certain applications by assigning priority.
Above the transport layer, there are certain protocols that are sometimes used and loosely fit in the session and presentation layers, most notably the Secure Sockets Layer (SSL) and Transport Layer Security (TLS) protocols. These protocols ensure that data transferred between two parties remains completely confidential.[89] Finally, at the application layer, are many of the protocols Internet users would be familiar with such as HTTP (web browsing), POP3 (e-mail), FTP (file transfer), IRC (Internet chat), BitTorrent (file sharing) and XMPP (instant messaging).
Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) allows data packets to be used for synchronous voice communications. The data packets are marked as voice type packets and can be prioritized by the network administrators so that the real-time, synchronous conversation is less subject to contention with other types of data traffic which can be delayed (i.e. file transfer or email) or buffered in advance (i.e. audio and video) without detriment. That prioritization is fine when the network has sufficient capacity for all the VoIP calls taking place at the same time and the network is enabled for prioritization i.e. a private corporate style network, but the Internet is not generally managed in this way and so there can be a big difference in the quality of VoIP calls over a private network and over the public Internet.[90]
Local area networks and wide area networks[edit]
Despite the growth of the Internet, the characteristics of local area networks (LANs)--computer networks that do not extend beyond a few kilometers—remain distinct. This is because networks on this scale do not require all the features associated with larger networks and are often more cost-effective and efficient without them. When they are not connected with the Internet, they also have the advantages of privacy and security. However, purposefully lacking a direct connection to the Internet does not provide assured protection from hackers, military forces, or economic powers. These threats exist if there are any methods for connecting remotely to the LAN.
Wide area networks (WANs) are private computer networks that may extend for thousands of kilometers. Once again, some of their advantages include privacy and security. Prime users of private LANs and WANs include armed forces and intelligence agencies that must keep their information secure and secret.
In the mid-1980s, several sets of communication protocols emerged to fill the gaps between the data-link layer and the application layer of the OSI reference model. These included Appletalk, IPX, and NetBIOS with the dominant protocol set during the early 1990s being IPX due to its popularity with MS-DOS users. TCP/IP existed at this point, but it was typically only used by large government and research facilities.[91]
As the Internet grew in popularity and its traffic was required to be routed into private networks, the TCP/IP protocols replaced existing local area network technologies. Additional technologies, such as DHCP, allowed TCP/IP-based computers to self-configure in the network. Such functions also existed in the AppleTalk/ IPX/ NetBIOS protocol sets.[92]
Whereas Asynchronous Transfer Mode (ATM) or Multiprotocol Label Switching (MPLS) are typical data-link protocols for larger networks such as WANs; Ethernet and Token Ring are typical data-link protocols for LANs. These protocols differ from the former protocols in that they are simpler, e.g., they omit features such as quality of service guarantees, and offer collision prevention. Both of these differences allow for more economical systems.[93]
Despite the modest popularity of IBM Token Ring in the 1980s and 1990s, virtually all LANs now use either wired or wireless Ethernet facilities. At the physical layer, most wired Ethernet implementations use copper twisted-pair cables (including the common 10BASE-T networks). However, some early implementations used heavier coaxial cables and some recent implementations (especially high-speed ones) use optical fibers.[94] When optic fibers are used, the distinction must be made between multimode fibers and single-mode fibers. Multimode fibers can be thought of as thicker optical fibers that are cheaper to manufacture devices for, but that suffers from less usable bandwidth and worse attenuation – implying poorer long-distance performance.[95]
Transmission capacity[edit]
The effective capacity to exchange information worldwide through two-way telecommunication networks grew from 281 petabytes of (optimally compressed) information in 1986, to 471 petabytes in 1993, to 2.2 (optimally compressed) exabytes in 2000, and to 65 (optimally compressed) exabytes in 2007.[83] This is the informational equivalent of two newspaper pages per person per day in 1986, and six entire newspapers per person per day by 2007.[96] Given this growth, telecommunications play an increasingly important role in the world economy and the global telecommunications industry was about a $4.7 trillion sector in 2012.[40][97] The service revenue of the global telecommunications industry was estimated to be $1.5 trillion in 2010, corresponding to 2.4% of the world’s gross domestic product (GDP).[40]
See also[edit]


Telecommunications portal




Active networks
Busy override
Digital Revolution
Dual-tone multi-frequency signaling
Information Age
International Teletraffic Congress
List of telecommunications encryption terms
Nanonetwork
New media
Outline of telecommunication
Push-button telephone
Telecommunications Industry Association
Telecoms resilience
Wavelength-division multiplexing
Wired communication


References[edit]
Citations[edit]


^ "Article 1.3" (PDF), ITU Radio Regulations, International Telecommunication Union, 2012 
^ Constitution and Convention of the International Telecommunication Union, Annex (Geneva, 1992)
^ "Definition of telecommunication". Yahoo. Retrieved 28 February 2013. 
^ "Telecommunication". Collins English Dictionary. Retrieved 28 February 2013. 
^ "Telecommunication". Vocabulary.com. Retrieved 28 February 2013. 
^ "Telecommunication". Merriam-Webster Dictionary. Retrieved 28 February 2013. 
^ a b "Telecommunication". Oxford Dictionaries. Oxford University Press. Retrieved 28 February 2013. 
^ "Telecommunication". Dictionary.com. Retrieved 28 February 2013. 
^ Websters definition: "2) technology that deals with telecommunication —usually used in plural"; Concise Encyclopedia definition: "Communication n parties at a distance from one another...."; and the Online Etymology Dictionary: "telecommunication (n.) 1932, from French télécommunication (see tele- + communication)."; and: " 1930s: from French télécommunication, from télé- 'at a distance' + communication 'communication' ", Oxford online.
^ "Online Etymology Dictionary". 
^ Jean-Marie Dilhac, From tele-communicare to Telecommunications, 2004.
^ Telecommunication, tele- and communication, New Oxford American Dictionary (2nd edition), 2005.
^ "Online Etymology Dictionary". 
^ Levi, Wendell (1977). The Pigeon. Sumter, S.C.: Levi Publishing Co, Inc. ISBN 0853900132. 
^ Blechman, Andrew (2007). Pigeons-The fascinating saga of the world's most revered and reviled bird. St Lucia, Queensland: University of Queensland Press. ISBN 9780702236419. 
^ "Chronology: Reuters, from pigeons to multimedia merger" (Web article). Reuters. Retrieved 2008-02-21. 
^ David Ross, The Spanish Armada, Britain Express, accessed October 2007.
^ Les Télégraphes Chappe, Cédrick Chatenet, l'Ecole Centrale de Lyon, 2003.
^ CCIT/ITU-T 50 Years of Excellence, International Telecommunication Union, 2006
^ William Brockedone. "Cooke and Wheatstone and the Invention of the Electric Telegraph". Republished by The Museum of Science and Technology (Ottawa).
^ The Electromagnetic Telegraph, J. B. Calvert, 19 May 2004.
^ The Atlantic Cable, Bern Dibner, Burndy Library Inc., 1959
^ Elisha Gray, Oberlin College Archives, Electronic Oberlin Group, 2006.
^ Antonio Santi Giuseppe Meucci, Eugenii Katz. (Retrieved May, 2006 from chem.ch.huji.ac.il)
^ Connected Earth: The telephone Archived 22 August 2006 at the Wayback Machine., BT, 2006.
^ History of AT&T, AT&T, 2006.
^ James Bowman Lindsay, Macdonald Black, Dundee City Council, 1999.
^ Tesla Biography, Ljubo Vujovic, Tesla Memorial Society of New York, 1998.
^ Tesla's Radio Controlled Boat, Twenty First Century Books, 2007.
^ The Pioneers Archived 14 May 2013 at the Wayback Machine., MZTV Museum of Television, 2006.
^ Philo Farnsworth, Neil Postman, TIME Magazine, 29 March 1999
^ George Stlibetz, Kerry Redshaw, 1996.
^ Hafner, Katie (1998). Where Wizards Stay Up Late: The Origins Of The Internet. Simon & Schuster. ISBN 0-684-83267-4. 
^ a b c Haykin, Simon (2001). Communication Systems (4th ed.). John Wiley & Sons. pp. 1–3. ISBN 0-471-17869-1. 
^ Ambardar, Ashok (1999). Analog and Digital Signal Processing (2nd ed.). Brooks/Cole Publishing Company. pp. 1–2. ISBN 0-534-95409-X. 
^ ATIS Telecom Glossary 2000 Archived 2 March 2008 at the Wayback Machine., ATIS Committee T1A1 Performance and Signal Processing (approved by the American National Standards Institute), 28 February 2001.
^ Haykin, pp 344–403.
^ Bluetooth Specification Version 2.0 + EDR (p 27), Bluetooth, 2004.
^ Haykin, pp 88–126.
^ a b c Worldwide Telecommunications Industry Revenues Archived 28 March 2010 at the Wayback Machine., Internet Engineering Task Force, June 2010.
^ Lenert, Edward (December 1998). "A Communication Theory Perspective on Telecommunications Policy". Journal of Communication. 48 (4): 3–23. doi:10.1111/j.1460-2466.1998.tb02767.x. 
^ Mireille Samaan (April 2003). "The Effect of Income Inequality on Mobile Phone Penetration". Boston University Honors thesis. Archived from the original (PDF) on 14 February 2007. Retrieved 8 June 2007. 
^ Röller, Lars-Hendrik; Leonard Waverman (2001). "Telecommunications Infrastructure and Economic Development: A Simultaneous Approach". American Economic Review. 91 (4): 909–923. ISSN 0002-8282. doi:10.1257/aer.91.4.909. 
^ Qiang, Rossotto, 2009, Economic Impact of Broadband, http://siteresources.worldbank.org/EXTIC4D/Resources/IC4D_Broadband_35_50.pdf
^ Riaz, Ali (1997). "The role of telecommunications in economic growth: proposal for an alternative framework of analysis". Media, Culture & Society. 19 (4): 557–583. doi:10.1177/016344397019004004. 
^ "Digital Access Index (DAI)". itu.int. Retrieved 6 March 2008. 
^ World Telecommunication Development Report 2003, International Telecommunication Union, 2003.
^ Fischer, Claude S. "'Touch Someone': The Telephone Industry Discovers Sociability." Technology and Culture 29.1 (January 1988): 32–61. JSTOR. Web. 4 October 2009.
^ "How do you know your love is real? Check Facebook". CNN. 4 April 2008. 
^ I Just Text To Say I Love You, Ipsos MORI, September 2005.
^ "Online News: For many home broadband users, the internet is a primary news source" (PDF). Pew Internet Project. 22 March 2006. 
^ "100 Leading National Advertisers" (PDF). Advertising Age. 23 June 2008. Retrieved 21 June 2009. 
^ International Telecommunication Union : About ITU. ITU. Accessed 21 July 2009. (PDF of regulation)
^ Codding, George A. Jr. "Jamming and the Protection of Frequency Assignments". The American Journal of International Law, Vol. 49, No. 3 (July , 1955), Published by: American Society of International Law. pp. 384–388. Republished by JSTOR.org The American Journal of International Law". Accessed 21 July 2009.
^ a b c d Wood, James & Science Museum (Great Britain) "History of international broadcasting". IET 1994, Volume 1, p.2 of 258 ISBN 0-86341-302-1, ISBN 978-0-86341-302-5. Republished by Googlebooks. Accessed 21 July 2009.
^ a b Garfield, Andrew. "The U.S. Counter-propaganda Failure in Iraq", FALL 2007, The Middle East Quarterly, Volume XIV: Number 4, Accessed 21 July 2009.
^ Wyatt, Edward (10 November 2014). "Obama Asks F.C.C. to Adopt Tough Net Neutrality Rules". New York Times. Retrieved 15 November 2014. 
^ NYT Editorial Board (14 November 2014). "Why the F.C.C. Should Heed President Obama on Internet Regulation". New York Times. Retrieved 15 November 2014. 
^ Computer sales review, guardian.co.uk, 2009.
^ Mobile phone sales data, palminfocenter.com, 2009.
^ PC early history, arstechnica.com, 2005.
^ Gartner Says Top Six Vendors Drive Worldwide Mobile Phone Sales to 21% Growth in 2005, Gartner Group, 28 February 2006.
^ Africa Calling, Victor and Irene Mbarika, IEEE Spectrum, May 2006.
^ Ten Years of GSM in Australia Archived 20 July 2008 at the Wayback Machine., Australia Telecommunications Association, 2003.
^ Milestones in AT&T History, AT&T Knowledge Ventures, 2006.
^ Optical fibre waveguide, Saleem Bhatti, 1995.
^ Fundamentals of DWDM Technology, CISCO Systems, 2006.
^ Report: DWDM No Match for Sonet, Mary Jander, Light Reading, 2006.
^ Stallings, William (2004). Data and Computer Communications (7th edition (intl) ed.). Pearson Prentice Hall. pp. 337–366. ISBN 0-13-183311-1. 
^ MPLS is the future, but ATM hangs on, John Dix, Network World, 2002
^ Lazar, Irwin (22 February 2011). "The WAN Road Ahead: Ethernet or Bust?". Telecom Industry Updates. Retrieved 22 February 2011. 
^ How Radio Works, HowStuffWorks.com, 2006.
^ Digital Television in Australia, Digital Television News Australia, 2001.
^ Stallings, William (2004). Data and Computer Communications (7th edition (intl) ed.). Pearson Prentice Hall. ISBN 0-13-183311-1. 
^ HDV Technology Handbook, Sony, 2004.
^ Audio, Digital Video Broadcasting Project, 2003.
^ Status of DAB (USA), World DAB Forum, March 2005.
^ Brian Stelter (13 June 2009). "Changeover to Digital TV Off to a Smooth Start". New York Times. 
^ GE 72664 Portable AM/FM Radio, Amazon.com, June 2006.
^ DAB Products, World DAB Forum, 2006.
^ Robert E. Kahn and Vinton G. Cerf, What Is The Internet (And What Makes It Work), December 1999. (specifically see footnote xv)
^ Jeff Tyson (2007). "How Internet Infrastructure Works". Computer.HowStuffWorks.com. 
^ a b "The World’s Technological Capacity to Store, Communicate, and Compute Information", Martin Hilbert and Priscila López (2011), Science, 332(6025), 60–65; free access to the study through here: martinhilbert.net/WorldInfoCapacity.html
^ World Internet Users and Population Stats, internetworldstats.com, 19 March 2007.
^ OECD Broadband Statistics, Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development, December 2005.
^ History of the OSI Reference Model, The TCP/IP Guide v3.0, Charles M. Kozierok, 2005.
^ Introduction to IPv6, Microsoft Corporation, February 2006.
^ Stallings, pp 683–702.
^ T. Dierks and C. Allen, The TLS Protocol Version 1.0, RFC 2246, 1999.
^ Multimedia, Crucible (2011-05-07). "VoIP, Voice over Internet Protocol and Internet telephone calls". 
^ Martin, Michael (2000). Understanding the Network (The Networker's Guide to AppleTalk, IPX, and NetBIOS), SAMS Publishing, ISBN 0-7357-0977-7.
^ Ralph Droms, Resources for DHCP, November 2003.
^ Stallings, pp. 500–526.
^ Stallings, pp 514–516.
^ Fiber Optic Cable Tutorial, Arc Electronics. Retrieved June 2007.
^ "video animation The Economist" Archived 18 January 2012 at the Wayback Machine..
^ Introduction to the Telecommunications Industry, Internet Engineering Task Force, June 2012.


Bibliography[edit]

Goggin, Gerard, Global Mobile Media (New York: Routledge, 2011), p. 176. ISBN 978-0415469180.
Haring, John (2008). "Telecommunications". In David R. Henderson (ed.). Concise Encyclopedia of Economics (2nd ed.). Library of Economics and Liberty. ISBN 978-0865976658. OCLC 237794267. CS1 maint: Extra text: editors list (link)
OECD, Universal Service and Rate Restructuring in Telecommunications, Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) Publishing, 1991. ISBN 92-64-13497-2.
Wheen, Andrew. Dot-Dash to Dot.Com: How Modern Telecommunications Evolved from the Telegraph to the Internet (Springer, 2011).

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Telecommunications.



International Teletraffic Congress
International Telecommunication Union (ITU)
ATIS Telecom Glossary
Federal Communications Commission
IEEE Communications Society
International Telecommunication Union
Ericsson's Understanding Telecommunications at the Wayback Machine (archived 13 April 2004) (Ericsson removed the book from their site in September 2005)







v
t
e


Telecommunications



History




Beacon
Broadcasting
Cable protection system
Cable TV
Communications satellite
Computer network
Drums
Electrical telegraph
Fax
Heliographs
Hydraulic telegraph
Internet
Mass media
Mobile phone
Optical telecommunication
Optical telegraphy
Pager
Photophone
Prepaid mobile phone
Radio
Radiotelephone
Satellite communications
Semaphore
Smartphone
Smoke signals
Telecommunications history
Telautograph
Telegraphy
Teleprinter (teletype)
Telephone
The Telephone Cases
Television
Timeline of communication technology
Undersea telegraph line
Videoconferencing
Videophone
Videotelephony
Whistled language





Pioneers



Edwin Howard Armstrong
John Logie Baird
Paul Baran
Alexander Graham Bell
Tim Berners-Lee
Jagadish Chandra Bose
Vint Cerf
Claude Chappe
Donald Davies
Lee de Forest
Philo Farnsworth
Reginald Fessenden
Elisha Gray
Erna Schneider Hoover
Charles K. Kao
Hedy Lamarr
Innocenzo Manzetti
Guglielmo Marconi
Antonio Meucci
Radia Perlman
Alexander Stepanovich Popov
Johann Philipp Reis
Nikola Tesla
Camille Tissot
Alfred Vail
Charles Wheatstone
Vladimir K. Zworykin





Transmission
media



Characteristic impedance
Coaxial cable
Electromagnetic radiation
Electrical cable
Free-space optical communication
Heaviside condition
Loading coil
Molecular communication
Optical fiber
Telegrapher's equations





Network topology
and switching



Links
Nodes
Terminal node
Network switching (circuit
packet)
Telephone exchange





Multiplexing



Space-division
Frequency-division
Time-division
Polarization-division
Orbital angular-momentum
Code-division





Networks



ARPANET
BITNET
Cellular network
Computer
CYCLADES
Ethernet
FidoNet
Internet
ISDN
LAN
Mobile
NGN
NPL network
Public Switched Telephone
Radio
Telecommunications equipment
Television
Telex
WAN
Wireless
World Wide Web








 Category
 Portal












v
t
e


Communication studies




Topics and
terminology




Biocommunication
Broadcasting
Communication
Computer-mediated communication
Conversation
History of communication
Information
Intercultural / Interpersonal / Intrapersonal communication
Journalism
Mass media
Meaning
Media ecology
Meta-communication
Models of communication
New media
Nonverbal communication
Propaganda
Reading
Speech
Symbol
Telecommunication
Text and conversation theory
Writing








Subfields



Communication design
Communication theory
Communicology
Crisis communication
Cross-cultural communication
Development communication
Discourse analysis
Environmental communication
Health communication
International communication
Mass communication
Media studies
Mediated cross-border communication
Organizational communication
Political communication
Risk communication
Science communication
Technical communication
Visual communication





Related fields



Conversation analysis
Critical theory
Cultural studies
Digital rhetoric
Film criticism
Heritage interpretation
Journalism

photojournalism


Linguistics
Philosophy of language
Political science
Pragmatics
Public relations
Rhetoric
Semiotics
Sociolinguistics
Sociology of culture
Theatre





Scholars



Adorno
Barthes
Bateson
Benjamin
Burke
Castells
Chomsky
Craig
Fisher
Flusser
Gerbner
Goffman
Habermas
Horkheimer
Huxley
Innis
Jakobson
Janis
Johnson
Kincaid
Lippman
Luhmann
Marcuse
McLuhan
Mead
Morgan
Ong
Packard
Peirce
Postman
Quebral
Richards
Rogers
Schramm
Tankard
Tannen
Wertheimer








Category
History
Journals
Organizations
Outline
Scholars
Templates










Telecommunications by region











v
t
e


Telecommunications in Africa



Sovereign states



Algeria
Angola
Benin
Botswana
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cameroon
Cape Verde
Central African Republic
Chad
Comoros
Democratic Republic of the Congo
Republic of the Congo
Djibouti
Egypt
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Ethiopia
Gabon
The Gambia
Ghana
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Ivory Coast (Côte d'Ivoire)
Kenya
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Madagascar
Malawi
Mali
Mauritania
Mauritius
Morocco
Mozambique
Namibia
Niger
Nigeria
Rwanda
São Tomé and Príncipe
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Somalia
South Africa
South Sudan
Sudan
Swaziland
Tanzania
Togo
Tunisia
Uganda
Zambia
Zimbabwe






States with limited
recognition




Sahrawi Arab Democratic Republic
Somaliland






Dependencies and
other territories





Canary Islands / Ceuta / Melilla / Plazas de soberanía (Spain)
Madeira (Portugal)
Mayotte / Réunion (France)
Saint Helena / Ascension Island / Tristan da Cunha (United Kingdom)
Western Sahara













v
t
e


Telecommunications in Asia



Sovereign states



Afghanistan
Armenia
Azerbaijan
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Bhutan
Brunei
Cambodia
China
Cyprus
East Timor (Timor-Leste)
Egypt
Georgia
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Israel
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
North Korea
South Korea
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Lebanon
Malaysia
Maldives
Mongolia
Myanmar
Nepal
Oman
Pakistan
Philippines
Qatar
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Sri Lanka
Syria
Tajikistan
Thailand
Turkey
Turkmenistan
United Arab Emirates
Uzbekistan
Vietnam
Yemen





States with
limited recognition



Abkhazia
Nagorno-Karabakh
Northern Cyprus
Palestine
South Ossetia
Taiwan





Dependencies and
other territories



British Indian Ocean Territory
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Hong Kong
Macau












v
t
e


Telecommunications in Europe



Sovereign states



Albania
Andorra
Armenia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Belarus
Belgium
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Bulgaria
Croatia
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Estonia
Finland
France
Georgia
Germany
Greece
Hungary
Iceland
Ireland

Italy
Kazakhstan
Latvia
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macedonia
Malta
Moldova
Monaco
Montenegro
Netherlands
Norway
Poland
Portugal
Romania
Russia
San Marino
Serbia
Slovakia
Slovenia
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland
Turkey
Ukraine
United Kingdom





States with limited
recognition



Abkhazia
Kosovo
Nagorno-Karabakh
Northern Cyprus
South Ossetia
Transnistria





Dependencies and
other entities



Åland
Faroe Islands
Gibraltar
Guernsey
Isle of Man
Jersey
Svalbard





Other entities



European Union












v
t
e


Telecommunications in North America



Sovereign states



Antigua and Barbuda
Bahamas
Barbados
Belize
Canada
Costa Rica
Cuba
Dominica
Dominican Republic
El Salvador
Grenada
Guatemala
Haiti
Honduras
Jamaica
Mexico
Nicaragua
Panama
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Trinidad and Tobago
United States






Dependencies and
other territories




Anguilla
Aruba
Bermuda
Bonaire
British Virgin Islands
Cayman Islands
Curaçao
Greenland
Guadeloupe
Martinique
Montserrat
Navassa Island
Puerto Rico
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saba
Sint Eustatius
Sint Maarten
Turks and Caicos Islands
United States Virgin Islands












v
t
e


Telecommunications in Oceania



Sovereign states



Australia
Federated States of Micronesia
Fiji
Kiribati
Marshall Islands
Nauru
New Zealand
Palau
Papua New Guinea
Samoa
Solomon Islands
Tonga
Tuvalu
Vanuatu





Associated states
of New Zealand



Cook Islands
Niue





Dependencies
and other territories



American Samoa
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Easter Island
French Polynesia
Guam
Hawaii
New Caledonia
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Pitcairn Islands
Tokelau
Wallis and Futuna












v
t
e


Telecommunications in South America



Sovereign states



Argentina
Bolivia
Brazil
Chile
Colombia
Ecuador
Guyana
Paraguay
Peru
Suriname
Uruguay
Venezuela






Dependencies and
other territories




Falkland Islands
French Guiana
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands













Find out more on Wikipedia's
Sister projects


Media
from Commons
News stories
from Wikinews
Definitions
from Wiktionary
Textbooks
from Wikibooks
Quotations
from Wikiquote
Source texts
from Wikisource
Learning resources
from Wikiversity
Data
from Wikidata







Authority control



LCCN: sh85133270
GND: 4059360-5
BNF: cb119335984 (data)
NDL: 00561375










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Telecommunication&oldid=793561233"					
Categories: ITU Radio RegulationsHistory of telecommunicationsHistory of radioHistory of televisionMedia technologyTelecommunicationsEconomics of transport and utility industriesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksPages using RFC magic linksUse dmy dates from January 2015All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Articles with unsourced statements from September 2008Articles with unsourced statements from February 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2008All articles containing potentially dated statementsCS1 maint: Extra text: editors listGood articlesWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةAragonésAsturianuবাংলাБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisFurlanGaeilgeGàidhligGalego贛語한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIdoবিষ্ণুপ্রিয়া মণিপুরীBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡქართულიҚазақшаKiswahiliKreyòl ayisyenLadinoລາວLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųLimburgsMagyarMalagasyമലയാളംBahasa MelayuMirandésမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanОлык марийپښتوPatoisPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRumantschРусиньскыйРусскийScotsShqipසිංහලSimple EnglishسنڌيSlovenčinaSlovenščinaSoomaaligaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยТоҷикӣTürkçeTürkmençeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinarayייִדישYorùbá粵語Zazaki中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 August 2017, at 14:39.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










General Mills: Marketing and advertising
















































Welcome to Global Site


ASK US ABOUT OUR FOOD
CHANGE COUNTRY



Welcome to Global Site















Menu




CHANGE COUNTRY

ASK US ABOUT OUR FOOD








Close








Search

Search



X

 United States
 Canada (English)
 French 






  /~/media/Images/GMI/BackgroundImages/workplacebanniereall.jpg




 
Responsibility






1463935903881637




Share:







Aa





cJ0df%2fjVF2oaKQsokOYkyy7c6Jn87pMPIZT3ihgrZQCfUBFUwrKoqIAt06ncDkLLyIyN%2fdLEcgoDnZWDtGt0xYpBFgRejPrgwbqOYp7RDeIuyoNZEN23XL5lrWq%2bJaTpJ3%2f3zmtu6srgcihqCK0G6LFGl1FFKUwN3bcln3RWFk419mAj2fuAn4maO%2b0cqPfI
R_d52afa1a5c144d4db080e0c27aa33881
o_6ps4jeh3ai

Marketing and advertising


We are committed to maintaining the highest standards for responsible marketing.
Each year, we establish industry-leading guidelines to ensure that we deliver on that commitment.

Our guidelines include:
Responsible marketing
General Mills will take care to ensure that our marketing messages are inclusive and respectful. We will not produce advertising that is vulgar, insulting, or demeaning, or that undermines the role of parents and family or respect for community authorities.  When placing advertising for our brands, General Mills will take steps to ensure that the advertising will air only on programming General Mills deems suitable, audience-appropriate, and relevant for the brand.
Responsible marketing
General Mills will take care to ensure that our marketing messages are inclusive and respectful. We will not produce marketing that is vulgar, insulting, or demeaning, or that undermines the role of parents and family or respect for community authorities.  When placing paid advertising for our brands, General Mills will take steps to ensure that the advertising will air only on programming General Mills deems suitable, audience-appropriate, and relevant for the brand.
Responsible Marketing Council
General Mills has established a Responsible Marketing Council. The responsibilities of the RMC include:
    a.  Drafting and issuing the General Mills Marketing Policies annually;
    b.  Ensuring full compliance with the Policies through training initiatives; and,
    c.  Holding annual advisory reviews of all new product development plans and brand marketing plans for products that will be marketed to children.
Advertising in schools
Regardless of the nutrition profile of the product, General Mills does not directly advertise food or beverage products in schools, pre-K through 12th grade.
Advertising to children under six
Regardless of the nutrition profile of the product, General Mills will not engage in any product advertising on programming or media primarily directed to children under six years of age.
Child Marketing Nutrition Standards
Unless a product meets the Children’s Food and Beverage Advertising Initiative ("CFBAI") Nutrition Standards (pdf, opens in new window) defined on the CFBAI website, the product must not be marketed to children under 12.  If a product does not meet the CFBAI Nutrition Standards:

the product will not be advertised on children’s programming, defined as any program for which 35 percent (or more) of the total viewing audience is under age 12;
the product will not participate in digital or interactive marketing activities (including websites, blogs, games, etc.) directed to children under age 12; and
the product will not participate in promotion marketing activities (including sweepstakes, contests, premiums, sponsorships, etc.) directed to children under age 12.

CARU compliance
i. General Compliance Requirements
The Better Business Bureau’s Children’s Advertising Review Unit (CARU) issues guidelines that play a major role in ensuring responsible advertising to children under 12 in the United States. General Mills is committed to full compliance with the CARU guidelines. The guidelines are posted at www.caru.org.
ii. Pre-screening
In the United States, General Mills will pre-screen all advertisements (TV, print, online) directed to children under 12 with CARU staff to proactively solicit CARU’s advice and input regarding proper messaging/content prior to distribution of these advertisements.
iii. Marking online advertising with “Ad Plane”
All online advertising directed to children under 12 in the United States will be clearly marked as advertising by using the General Mills “Ad Plane” or other means to identify the presence of advertising content on our child-targeted websites in compliance with CARU guidelines.
COPPA and other privacy compliance
i. General COPPA compliance requirements
General Mills operates in full compliance with the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”), which governs the online collection and use of personal information from children under 13 in the United States.
ii. Email marketing
General Mills does not engage in email marketing directed to individuals under 18 years of age.
iii. Online behavioral advertising
As required by law, General Mills does not engage in online behavioral advertising techniques (i.e., collecting individual online behavior data on General Mills websites and then using that information to direct online advertising to individuals on other sites) when marketing to children
Social media, blogs, chats, and user-generated content
i. Third-party social media platforms
Through its own websites or other communications, General Mills will not encourage children to participate in third-party social media services where the participation of children at these ages is not consistent with the terms of use of those services, and will not create promotions directed to children involving the use of these third-party social media services.
ii. Blogs, chats, and similar interactive communications
General Mills will not operate any blogs, message boards, chat rooms, or other similar online forums directed to children under the age of 13.
iii. Social sharing tools
No social sharing tools (such as means for sharing material on Facebook) may be included on any General Mills website directed to children under the age of 13.
Balance, moderation and exercise
All child-directed marketing communications/activity will respect General Mills’ Balance, Moderation, and Exercise (“BME”) strategy by focusing on these steps to healthier living:

Balance:  Encourage families and children to understand and follow nutritional guidelines for a balanced diet of healthy and nutritious foods. 
Moderation:  Encourage families/children to eat sensible portions of food at any one sitting and throughout each day – never depict or encourage over-consumption. 
Exercise:  Advocate and reinforce the importance of higher levels of physical activity. 

The "Balance, Moderation & Exercise" message will be incorporated into communications as appropriate.
Representations of food
In all child-directed marketing, food must be represented with appropriate realism, reflecting sensible portions and/or serving sizes.  Over-consumption may not be depicted.
Representations of kids
In child-directed marketing, children must be depicted as active and energetic, engaging in physical activity in support of the General Mills BME strategy.
Physical activity
General Mills actively seeks ways to promote physical activity within interactive media.  All General Mills online games and activities directed to children under 12 on General Mills sites must include a 15-minute “activity break” pausing the game or activity to encourage children to engage in another “more active” activity.






Learn more

2016 Annual Report
150 years of growth 
Global Responsibility

2017 report 











Recent Responsibility stories


Responsibility


You're hearing about bees for a reason



Responsibility


Our volunteers have an award-winning impact



Responsibility


MealConnect cuts waste while stocking food shelves



Responsibility


Who would have thought? Oat hull power?


















General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies - Products




















 


IBC
      Stand# 1.A41
      Sept 15-19, 2017
    Amsterdam


 


CABSAT
Stand# TBD
Jan 14-16, 2018
Dubai


 


SATELLITE
      Booth# 1025
      Mar 13-15, 2018
      Washington, DC


 


NAB
Booth# OE20012
Apr 9-12, 2018
Las Vegas


 


CommunicAsia
Stand# TBD
Jun 26-28, 2018
Singapore









           The products Ready-to-Go (RTG) program is in response to feedback from our customers  and   guarantees delivery of 30 days  after acceptance of an order for a wide range of our standard products.  




					General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies designs, produces, and installs a full line of antennas for mobile satellite 
					communications and fixed communication gateways. Frequency ranges for certain of these products 
					include L, S, C, X, Ku, and Ka.				




					General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies specializes in the design, development, and manufacture of state-of-the-art 
					electronic products for satellite communication operators worldwide.				




					General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies  produces state-of-the-art satellite antenna control units, power drive units, tracking down converters 
					and receivers and monitor and control systems.				





					General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies specializes in producing the highest quality microwave components for 
					microwave industry applications.				





			    General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies' On-the-MoveTM technology offers robust   voice and data wideband satellite communications from vehicles in motion over   rugged terrain. X, Ku and Ka-band modular, interchangeable payloads are   available. 





			General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies offer expertise in the emerging Ka-band applications. Our highly trained engineering team has experience with Ka-band products ranging from antennas, both large and small aperture, to feeds, filters, drive systems and highly sophisticated RF electronics.


 


                General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies’ 2400 and 2800 Series Rackmount Cases provide exceptional equipment protection with the added utility of slide-mounted 19-inch racks. 







              Freedom Communication Technologies, Inc. has acquired the  Communications Test Equipment product line.

www.freedomcte.com





HOME  |  
PRODUCTS  |  
SOLUTIONS  | 
CONTACT US  | 
CUSTOMER CARE  |  
INFORMATION  |  
CAREERS   |  
SUPPLIERS


Copyright © 2014 General Dynamics SATCOM Technologies














